Indiana, session 2026, HB1343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is plainly
repugnant to the intent of the general assembly or of the context of the
statute:
(1) "Adult", "of full age", and "person in his majority" mean a
person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) "Attorney" includes a counselor or other person authorized to
appear and represent a party in an action or special proceeding.
(3) "Autism" means a neurological condition as described in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.
(4) "Bond" does not necessarily imply a seal.
(5) "Clerk" means the clerk of the court or a person authorized to
perform the clerk's duties.
(6) "Health record", "hospital record", or "medical record" means
written or printed information possessed by a provider (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-295) concerning any diagnosis, treatment, or
prognosis of the patient, unless otherwise defined. Except as
otherwise provided, the terms include mental health records and
drug and alcohol abuse records.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

2
(7) "Highway" includes county bridges and state and county
roads, unless otherwise expressly provided.
(8) "Infant" or "minor" means a person less than eighteen (18)
years of age.
(9) "Inhabitant" may be construed to mean a resident in any place.
(10) "Judgment" means all final orders, decrees, and
determinations in an action and all orders upon which executions
may issue.
(11) "Land", "real estate", and "real property" include lands,
tenements, and hereditaments.
(12) "Mentally incompetent" means of unsound mind.
(13) "Money demands on contract", when used in reference to an
action, means an action arising out of contract when the relief
demanded is a recovery of money.
(14) "Month" means a calendar month, unless otherwise
expressed.
(15) "Noncode statute" means a statute that is not codified as part
of the Indiana Code.
(16) "Oath" includes "affirmation", and "to swear" includes to
"affirm".
(17) "Person" extends to bodies politic and corporate.
(18) "Personal property" includes goods, chattels, evidences of
debt, and things in action.
(19) "Population" has the meaning set forth in IC 1-1-3.5-3.
(20) "Preceding" and "following", referring to sections in statutes,
mean the sections next preceding or next following that in which
the words occur, unless some other section is designated.
(21) "Property" includes personal and real property.
(22) "Sheriff" means the sheriff of the county or another person
authorized to perform sheriff's duties.
(23) "State", applied to any one (1) of the United States, includes
the District of Columbia and the commonwealths, possessions,
states in free association with the United States, and the
territories. "United States" includes the District of Columbia and
the commonwealths, possessions, states in free association with
the United States, and the territories.
(24) "Under legal disabilities" includes persons less than eighteen
(18) years of age, mentally incompetent, or out of the United
States.
(25) "Verified", when applied to pleadings, means supported by
oath or affirmation in writing.
(26) "Will" includes a testament and codicil.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

3
(27) "Without relief" in any judgment, contract, execution, or
other instrument of writing or record, means without the benefit
of valuation laws.
(28) "Written" and "in writing" include printing, lithographing, or
other mode of representing words and letters. If the written
signature of a person is required, the terms mean the proper
handwriting of the person or the person's mark.
(29) "Year" means a calendar year, unless otherwise expressed.
(30) The definitions in IC 35-31.5 apply to all statutes relating to
penal offenses.
(b) This subsection applies to the definitions of "Hoosier veteran"
and "veteran" when used in reference to state programs for veterans.
The term "veteran" includes "Hoosier veteran", and applies to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is expressly
excluded by the terms of the statute, is plainly repugnant to the intent
of the general assembly or of the context of the statute, or is
inconsistent with federal law. "Hoosier veteran" means an individual
who meets the following criteria:
(1) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(2) The individual served in an active or reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States or the Indiana National Guard.
(3) The individual completed any required military occupational
specialty training and was not discharged or separated from the
armed forces or the Indiana National Guard under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
The definitions set forth in this subsection may not be construed to
affect a Hoosier veteran's eligibility for any state program that is based
upon a particular aspect of the Hoosier veteran's service such as a
disability or a wartime service requirement.
SECTION 2. IC 4-13-16.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.
(b) "Commission" refers to the governor's commission on supplier
diversity established under section 2 of this chapter.
(c) "Commissioner" refers to the commissioner of the department.
(d) "Contract" means any contract awarded by a state agency or, as
set forth in section 2(g)(11) of this chapter, awarded by a recipient of
state grant funds, for construction projects or the procurement of goods
or services, including professional services. For purposes of this
subsection, "goods or services" may not include the following when
HEA 1343 — CC 1

4
determining the total value of contracts for state agencies:
(1) Utilities.
(2) Health care services (as defined in IC 27-8-11-1(c)).
(3) Rent paid for real property or payments constituting the price
of an interest in real property as a result of a real estate
transaction.
(e) "Contractor" means a person or entity that:
(1) contracts with a state agency; or
(2) as set forth in section 2(g)(11) of this chapter:
(A) is a recipient of state grant funds; and
(B) enters into a contract:
(i) with a person or entity other than a state agency; and
(ii) that is paid for in whole or in part with the state grant
funds.
(f) "Department" refers to the Indiana department of administration
established by IC 4-13-1-2.
(g) "Deputy commissioner" refers to the deputy commissioner for
supplier diversity of the department.
(h) "Minority business enterprise" or "minority business" means an
individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint
venture of any kind that is owned and controlled by one (1) or more
persons who are:
(1) United States citizens; and
(2) members of a minority group or a qualified minority nonprofit
corporation.
(i) "NGB-22" means the National Guard Report of Separation form
or its predecessor or successor form.
(j) "Qualified minority or women's nonprofit corporation" means a
corporation that:
(1) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) is headquartered in Indiana;
(3) has been in continuous existence for at least five (5) years;
(4) has a board of directors that has been in compliance with all
other requirements of this chapter for at least five (5) years;
(5) is chartered for the benefit of the minority community or
women; and
(6) provides a service that will not impede competition among
minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises at
the time a nonprofit applies for certification as a minority
business enterprise or a women's business enterprise.
(k) "Owned and controlled" means:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

5
(1) if the business is a qualified minority nonprofit corporation, a
majority of the board of directors are minority;
(2) if the business is a qualified women's nonprofit corporation,
a majority of the members of the board of directors are women; or
(3) if the business is a business other than a qualified minority or
women's nonprofit corporation, having:
(A) ownership of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the
enterprise, including corporate stock of a corporation;
(B) control over the management and active in the day-to-day
operations of the business; and
(C) an interest in the capital, assets, and profits and losses of
the business proportionate to the percentage of ownership.
(l) "Minority group" means:
(1) African Americans;
(2) Native Americans;
(3) Hispanic Americans; and
(4) Asian Americans.
(m) "Separate body corporate and politic" refers to an entity
established by the general assembly as a body corporate and politic.
(n) "State agency" refers to any authority, board, branch,
commission, committee, department, division, or other instrumentality
of the executive, including the administrative, department of state
government.
(o) "Veteran" means an individual who:
(1) has previously:
(A) served on active duty in any branch of the armed forces of
the United States or their reserves, in the national guard, or in
the Indiana National Guard; and
(B) received a discharge from service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2);
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2); or
(2) is currently serving in:
(A) any branch of the armed forces of the United States or
their reserves;
(B) the national guard; or
(C) the Indiana National Guard.
(p) "Veteran owned small business" refers to a small business that:
(1) is independently owned and operated;
(2) is not dominant in its field of operation; and
(3) satisfies the criteria to be a veteran owned small business
concern as specified in section 1.5 of this chapter.
(q) "Women's business enterprise" means a business that is one (1)
HEA 1343 — CC 1

6
of the following:
(1) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman.
(2) A partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by
women in which:
(A) at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the ownership is held by
women; and
(B) the management and daily business operations are
controlled by at least one (1) of the women who owns the
business.
(3) A corporation or other entity:
(A) whose management and daily business operations are
controlled by at least one (1) of the women who owns the
business; and
(B) that is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by women,
or if stock is issued, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the
stock is owned by at least one (1) of the women.
(4) A qualified women's nonprofit corporation.
SECTION 3. IC 4-15-2.2-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) Former members of the armed forces of the
United States who meet both of the following requirements shall
receive a preference for appointment or reemployment in the state
classified service:
(1) The veteran served on active duty in any branch of the armed
forces.
(2) The veteran was not discharged or separated from the armed
forces under conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(b) When:
(1) preemployment interviews of external candidates are
conducted; and
(2) the qualified applicant pool includes veterans;
veterans must be included in the group offered interviews.
(c) In computing seniority for purposes of a personnel reduction in
state civil service, the computation must include the length of time the
employee spent on active duty in the armed forces of the United States.
SECTION 4. IC 5-2-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2023,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The board shall adopt in accordance with
IC 4-22-2 all necessary rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
The rules, which shall be adopted only after necessary and proper
investigation and inquiry by the board, shall include the establishment
HEA 1343 — CC 1

7
of the following:
(1) A consistent and uniform statewide deadly force policy and
training program, that is consistent with state and federal law.
Upon adoption by the law enforcement training board, the policy
and training program must be implemented, without modification,
by all Indiana law enforcement agencies, offices, or departments.
(2) A consistent and uniform statewide defensive tactics policy
and training program, that is consistent with state and federal law.
Upon adoption by the law enforcement training board, the policy
and training program must be implemented, without modification,
by all Indiana law enforcement agencies, offices, or departments.
(3) A uniform statewide minimum standard for vehicle pursuits
consistent with state and federal law.
(4) Minimum standards of physical, educational, mental, and
moral fitness which shall govern the acceptance of any person for
training by any law enforcement training school or academy
meeting or exceeding the minimum standards established
pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Minimum standards for law enforcement training schools
administered by towns, cities, counties, law enforcement training
centers, agencies, or departments of the state.
(6) Minimum standards for courses of study, attendance
requirements, equipment, and facilities for approved town, city,
county, and state law enforcement officer, police reserve officer,
and conservation reserve officer training schools.
(7) Minimum standards for a course of study on cultural diversity
awareness, including training on the U nonimmigrant visa created
through the federal Victims of Trafficking and Violence
Protection Act of 2000 (P.L. 106-386) that must be required for
each person accepted for training at a law enforcement training
school or academy. Cultural diversity awareness study must
include an understanding of cultural issues related to race,
religion, gender, age, domestic violence, national origin, and
physical and mental disabilities.
(8) Minimum qualifications for instructors at approved law
enforcement training schools.
(9) Minimum basic training requirements which law enforcement
officers appointed to probationary terms shall complete before
being eligible for continued or permanent employment.
(10) Minimum basic training requirements which law
enforcement officers appointed on other than a permanent basis
shall complete in order to be eligible for continued employment
HEA 1343 — CC 1

8
or permanent appointment.
(11) Minimum basic training requirements which law
enforcement officers appointed on a permanent basis shall
complete in order to be eligible for continued employment.
(12) Minimum basic training requirements for each person
accepted for training at a law enforcement training school or
academy that include six (6) hours of training in interacting with:
(A) persons with autism, mental illness, addictive disorders,
intellectual disabilities, and developmental disabilities;
(B) missing endangered adults (as defined in IC 12-7-2-131.3);
and
(C) persons with Alzheimer's disease or related senile
dementia;
to be provided by persons approved by the secretary of family and
social services and the board. The training must include an
overview of the crisis intervention teams.
(13) Minimum standards for a course of study on human and
sexual trafficking that must be required for each person accepted
for training at a law enforcement training school or academy and
for inservice training programs for law enforcement officers. The
course must cover the following topics:
(A) Examination of the human and sexual trafficking laws (IC
35-42-3.5).
(B) Identification of human and sexual trafficking.
(C) Communicating with traumatized persons.
(D) Therapeutically appropriate investigative techniques.
(E) Collaboration with federal law enforcement officials.
(F) Rights of and protections afforded to victims.
(G) Providing documentation that satisfies the Declaration of
Law Enforcement Officer for Victim of Trafficking in Persons
(Form I-914, Supplement B) requirements established under
federal law.
(H) The availability of community resources to assist human
and sexual trafficking victims.
(14) Minimum standards for ongoing specialized, intensive, and
integrative training for persons responsible for investigating
sexual assault cases involving adult victims. This training must
include instruction on:
(A) the neurobiology of trauma;
(B) trauma informed interviewing; and
(C) investigative techniques.
(15) Minimum standards for de-escalation training. De-escalation
HEA 1343 — CC 1

9
training shall be taught as a part of existing use-of-force training
and not as a separate topic.
(16) Minimum standards regarding best practices for crowd
control, protests, and First Amendment activities.
(17) Minimum standards for basic training and inservice training
programs, which may be completed online or by other means of
virtual instruction, that occur after December 31, 2024, and that
address the mental health and wellness of law enforcement
officers including:
(A) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of law
enforcement officers and manage the stress and trauma of
policing;
(B) recognizing:
(i) symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder; and
(ii) signs of suicidal behavior; and
(C) information on mental health resources available for law
enforcement officers.
All statewide policies and minimum standards shall be documented in
writing and published on the Indiana law enforcement academy (ILEA)
website. Any policy, standard, or training program implemented,
adopted, or promulgated by a vote of the board may only subsequently
be modified or rescinded by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the
board.
(b) A law enforcement officer appointed after July 5, 1972, and
before July 1, 1993, may not enforce the laws or ordinances of the state
or any political subdivision unless the officer has, within one (1) year
from the date of appointment, successfully completed the minimum
basic training requirements established under this chapter by the board.
If a person fails to successfully complete the basic training
requirements within one (1) year from the date of employment, the
officer may not perform any of the duties of a law enforcement officer
involving control or direction of members of the public or exercising
the power of arrest until the officer has successfully completed the
training requirements. This subsection does not apply to any law
enforcement officer appointed before July 6, 1972, or after June 30,
1993.
(c) Military leave or other authorized leave of absence from law
enforcement duty during the first year of employment after July 6,
1972, shall toll the running of the first year, which shall be calculated
by the aggregate of the time before and after the leave, for the purposes
of this chapter.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e), (m), (t), and (u), a law
HEA 1343 — CC 1

10
enforcement officer appointed to a law enforcement department or
agency after June 30, 1993, may not:
(1) make an arrest;
(2) conduct a search or a seizure of a person or property; or
(3) carry a firearm;
unless the law enforcement officer successfully completes, within one
(1) year from the date of original appointment, at a board certified
law enforcement academy or at a law enforcement training center
under section 10.5 or 15.2 of this chapter, the basic training
requirements established by the board under this chapter. The board
may waive some or all of the basic training requirements for an
out-of-state officer who has a minimum of ten (10) years of paid
full-time law enforcement experience with a state, county, city, or
similar municipal law enforcement agency, after receiving a basic
law enforcement training certificate achieved at a state-approved
law enforcement academy, and who has not been out of law
enforcement for more than six (6) years. Further, the board may
waive the basic training requirements for an out-of-state law
enforcement officer who has a minimum of one (1) year of paid
full-time law enforcement experience with an out-of-state law
enforcement agency after achieving a basic law enforcement
training certificate from a state-approved law enforcement
academy meeting or exceeding the basic training requirements
established by the board under this chapter. Waiver applicants
must be in good standing with all previous law enforcement
employers.
(e) This subsection does not apply to:
(1) a gaming agent employed as a law enforcement officer by the
Indiana gaming commission; or
(2) an:
(A) attorney; or
(B) investigator;
designated by the securities commissioner as a police officer of
the state under IC 23-19-6-1(k).
Before a law enforcement officer appointed after June 30, 1993,
completes the basic training requirements, the law enforcement officer
may exercise the police powers described in subsection (d) if the
officer successfully completes the pre-basic course established in
subsection (f). Successful completion of the pre-basic course authorizes
a law enforcement officer to exercise the police powers described in
subsection (d) for one (1) year after the date the law enforcement
officer is appointed.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

11
(f) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a
pre-basic course for the purpose of training:
(1) law enforcement officers;
(2) police reserve officers (as described in IC 36-8-3-20); and
(3) conservation reserve officers (as described in IC 14-9-8-27);
regarding the subjects of arrest, search and seizure, the lawful use of
force, de-escalation training, interacting with individuals with autism,
and the operation of an emergency vehicle. The pre-basic course must
be offered on a periodic basis throughout the year at regional sites
statewide. The pre-basic course must consist of at least forty (40) hours
of course work. The board may prepare the classroom part of the
pre-basic course using available technology in conjunction with live
instruction. The board shall provide the course material, the instructors,
and the facilities at the regional sites throughout the state that are used
for the pre-basic course. In addition, the board may certify pre-basic
courses that may be conducted by other public or private training
entities, including postsecondary educational institutions.
(g) Subject to subsection (h), the board shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to establish a mandatory inservice training program for
police officers and police reserve officers (as described in
IC 36-8-3-20). After June 30, 1993, a law enforcement officer who has
satisfactorily completed basic training and has been appointed to a law
enforcement department or agency on either a full-time or part-time
basis is not eligible for continued employment unless the officer
satisfactorily completes the mandatory inservice training requirements
established by rules adopted by the board. Inservice training must
include de-escalation training. Inservice training must also include:
(1) training:
(A) in interacting with persons with mental illness, addictive
disorders, intellectual disabilities, autism, developmental
disabilities, and Alzheimer's disease or related senile
dementia; and
(B) provided by persons approved by the secretary of family
and social services and the board;
(2) after December 31, 2024, annual training, which may be
completed online or by other means of virtual instruction, that
addresses the mental health and wellness of law enforcement
officers including:
(A) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of law
enforcement officers and manage the stress and trauma of
policing;
(B) recognizing:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

12
(i) symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder; and
(ii) signs of suicidal behavior; and
(C) information on mental health resources available for law
enforcement officers; and
(3) training concerning:
(A) human and sexual trafficking; and
(B) high risk missing persons (as defined in IC 5-2-17-1).
The board may approve courses offered by other public or private
training entities, including postsecondary educational institutions, as
necessary in order to ensure the availability of an adequate number of
inservice training programs. The board may waive an officer's inservice
training requirements if the board determines that the officer's reason
for lacking the required amount of inservice training hours is due to
either an emergency situation or the unavailability of courses.
(h) This subsection applies only to a mandatory inservice training
program under subsection (g). Notwithstanding subsection (g), the
board may, without adopting rules under IC 4-22-2, modify the course
work of a training subject matter, modify the number of hours of
training required within a particular subject matter, or add a new
subject matter, if the board satisfies the following requirements:
(1) The board must conduct at least two (2) public meetings on
the proposed modification or addition.
(2) After approving the modification or addition at a public
meeting, the board must post notice of the modification or
addition on the Indiana law enforcement academy's website at
least thirty (30) days before the modification or addition takes
effect.
If the board does not satisfy the requirements of this subsection, the
modification or addition is void. This subsection does not authorize the
board to eliminate any inservice training subject matter required under
subsection (g).
(i) The board shall also adopt rules establishing a town marshal and
conservancy district marshal basic training program, subject to the
following:
(1) The program must require fewer hours of instruction and class
attendance and fewer courses of study than are required for the
mandated basic training program.
(2) Certain parts of the course materials may be studied by a
candidate at the candidate's home in order to fulfill requirements
of the program.
(3) Law enforcement officers successfully completing the
requirements of the program are eligible for appointment only in
HEA 1343 — CC 1

13
towns employing the town marshal system (IC 36-5-7) or a
conservancy district that employs a conservancy district marshal
under IC 14-33-25 and having not more than one (1) marshal and
six (6) deputies.
(4) The limitation imposed by subdivision (3) does not apply to an
officer who has successfully completed the mandated basic
training program.
(5) The time limitations imposed by subsections (b) and (c) for
completing the training are also applicable to the marshal basic
training program.
(6) The program must require training in interacting with
individuals with autism.
(j) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish an
executive training program. The executive training program must
include training in the following areas:
(1) Liability.
(2) Media relations.
(3) Accounting and administration.
(4) Discipline.
(5) Department policy making.
(6) Lawful use of force and de-escalation training.
(7) Department programs.
(8) Emergency vehicle operation.
(9) Cultural diversity.
(10) After December 31, 2024, mental health and wellness and
suicide prevention of law enforcement officers. The training
requirement under this subdivision may be provided as part of an
online course or by other means of virtual instruction.
(k) A police chief shall apply for admission to the executive training
program within two (2) months of the date the police chief initially
takes office. A police chief must successfully complete the executive
training program within six (6) months of the date the police chief
initially takes office. However, if space in the executive training
program is not available at a time that will allow completion of the
executive training program within six (6) months of the date the police
chief initially takes office, the police chief must successfully complete
the next available executive training program that is offered after the
police chief initially takes office.
(l) A police chief who fails to comply with subsection (k) may not
continue to serve as the police chief until completion of the executive
training program. For the purposes of this subsection and subsection
(k), "police chief" refers to:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

14
(1) the police chief of any city;
(2) the police chief of any town having a metropolitan police
department; and
(3) the chief of a consolidated law enforcement department
established under IC 36-3-1-5.1.
A town marshal or a conservancy district marshal is not considered to
be a police chief for these purposes, but a town marshal or a
conservancy district marshal may enroll in the executive training
program.
(m) A fire investigator in the department of homeland security
appointed after December 31, 1993, is required to comply with the
basic training standards established under this chapter.
(n) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a
program to certify handgun safety courses, including courses offered
in the private sector, that meet standards approved by the board for
training probation officers in handgun safety as required by
IC 11-13-1-3.5(2).
(o) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a
refresher course for an officer who:
(1) is hired by an Indiana law enforcement department or agency
as a law enforcement officer;
(2) has not been employed as a law enforcement officer for:
(A) at least two (2) years; and
(B) less than six (6) years before the officer is hired under
subdivision (1); and
(3) completed at any time a basic training course certified or
recognized by the board before the officer is hired under
subdivision (1).
(p) An officer to whom subsection (o) applies must successfully
complete the refresher course described in subsection (o) not later than
six (6) months after the officer's date of hire, or the officer loses the
officer's powers of:
(1) arrest;
(2) search; and
(3) seizure.
(q) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a
refresher course for an officer who:
(1) is appointed by an Indiana law enforcement department or
agency as a reserve police officer; and
(2) has not worked as a reserve police officer for at least two (2)
years after:
(A) completing the pre-basic course; or
HEA 1343 — CC 1

15
(B) leaving the individual's last appointment as a reserve
police officer.
An officer to whom this subsection applies must successfully complete
the refresher course established by the board in order to work as a
reserve police officer.
(r) This subsection applies to an individual who, at the time the
individual completes a board certified or recognized basic training
course, has not been appointed as a law enforcement officer by an
Indiana law enforcement department or agency. If the individual is not
employed as a law enforcement officer for at least two (2) years after
completing the basic training course, the individual must successfully
retake and complete the basic training course as set forth in subsection
(d).
(s) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a
refresher course for an individual who:
(1) is appointed as a board certified instructor of law enforcement
training; and
(2) has not provided law enforcement training instruction for
more than one (1) year after the date the individual's instructor
certification expired.
An individual to whom this subsection applies must successfully
complete the refresher course established by the board in order to
renew the individual's instructor certification.
(t) This subsection applies only to a gaming agent employed as a
law enforcement officer by the Indiana gaming commission. A gaming
agent appointed after June 30, 2005, may exercise the police powers
described in subsection (d) if:
(1) the agent successfully completes the pre-basic course
established in subsection (f); and
(2) the agent successfully completes any other training courses
established by the Indiana gaming commission in conjunction
with the board.
(u) This subsection applies only to a securities enforcement officer
designated as a law enforcement officer by the securities
commissioner. A securities enforcement officer may exercise the police
powers described in subsection (d) if:
(1) the securities enforcement officer successfully completes the
pre-basic course established in subsection (f); and
(2) the securities enforcement officer successfully completes any
other training courses established by the securities commissioner
in conjunction with the board.
(v) This subsection applies only to a correctional police officer
HEA 1343 — CC 1

16
employed by the department of correction. A correctional police officer
may exercise the police powers described in subsection (d) if:
(1) the officer successfully completes the pre-basic course
described in subsection (f); and
(2) the officer successfully completes any other training courses
established by the department of correction in conjunction with
the board.
(w) This subsection applies only to the sexual assault training
described in subsection (a)(14). The board shall:
(1) consult with experts on the neurobiology of trauma, trauma
informed interviewing, and investigative techniques in developing
the sexual assault training; and
(2) develop the sexual assault training and begin offering the
training not later than July 1, 2022.
(x) After July 1, 2023, a law enforcement officer who regularly
investigates sexual assaults involving adult victims must complete the
training requirements described in subsection (a)(14) within one (1)
year of being assigned to regularly investigate sexual assaults involving
adult victims.
(y) A law enforcement officer who regularly investigates sexual
assaults involving adult victims may complete the training
requirements described in subsection (a)(14) by attending a:
(1) statewide or national training; or
(2) department hosted local training.
(z) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the board
is authorized to establish certain required standards of training and
procedure.
SECTION 5. IC 5-2-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.100-2012,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) There is hereby created the position of
executive director of the law enforcement training board.
(b) The executive director shall be selected by the board. The
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board. and the
executive director's tenure of office shall be protected by a four (4)
year, renewable contract of employment which may be terminated
earlier by the board only for inefficiency, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or other good cause after having been accorded a hearing by the
board upon reasonable notice of the charge being made against the
executive director. A vote of at least eleven (11) members of the board
shall be necessary for the early termination of said contract of
employment. The executive director shall be selected on the basis of
education, training, and experience, and shall have at least ten (10)
HEA 1343 — CC 1

17
years experience as an active law enforcement officer, at least five (5)
years of which shall have been in an executive or administrative
capacity.
(c) The executive director shall:
(1) perform such duties as may be assigned by the board; and
(2) shall be the chief administrative officer of the law
enforcement academy.
(d) The salary and compensation for the executive director, the
training staff, and employees shall be fixed by the board with the
approval of the governor.
(e) The executive director shall establish a table of organization to
be supplemented with job descriptions for each position subordinate to
that of the executive director, all of which shall be subject to the
approval of the board.
(f) All persons individuals hired to fill such approved vacancies
shall be selected on the basis of qualifications and merit based on
training, education, and experience.
(g) Employees and members of the training staff shall not be subject
to discharge, demotion, or suspension because of political affiliation,
but may be discharged, demoted, or suspended only for cause after
charges preferred in writing by the executive director.
(h) Any person so discharged or disciplined employee shall have a
right to a hearing before the board if such person the employee
requests a hearing by giving notice to the executive director within
fifteen (15) days after receiving written notice of discharge or
disciplinary action.
(i) Procedures under this section shall be consistent with IC 4-21.5.
SECTION 6. IC 5-2-1-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The facilities of the law enforcement
academy shall be available to any law enforcement agency of the state,
or any of its political subdivisions, subject to the rules of the board.
(b) Any law enforcement agency of the state, any of its political
subdivisions, or any board certified training center may conduct
training:
(1) for the law enforcement agency of any political subdivision in
Indiana; and
(2) in facilities other than those of the law enforcement academy;
if the minimum standards established by the board are met or exceeded.
(c) A law enforcement agency or a board certified training center
conducting approved local training under subsection (b) may be
entitled to a per capita allowance from the law enforcement training
HEA 1343 — CC 1

18
fund to defray such portions of the cost of basic training as shall be
approved by the board. Such per capita allowance shall be earmarked
and expended only for law enforcement training.
(d) The facilities of the law enforcement academy shall be available
for the training of railroad police, prison and industrial plant guards,
tribal police, postsecondary educational institution safety and security
personnel, whether public or private, for the training of any law
enforcement agency from outside Indiana, and for the training of
members in the military police force of the Indiana National Guard
under IC 10-16-23 and such other enforcement related groups as shall
be approved by the board, upon terms and conditions established by the
board. Railroad police, tribal police, Indiana National Guard, and any
law enforcement agency from outside Indiana, and nongovernmental
enforcement related groups qualifying to use the facilities of the
academy under the rules of the board shall be required to reimburse the
law enforcement training fund for the cost of such training.
(e) The facilities of the law enforcement academy may be used for
the training of firefighting personnel where the subject matter of the
training relates to duties which involve law enforcement related
conduct. Such training shall be conducted upon terms and conditions
established by the board. However, no volunteer firefighter is required
to attend training at the academy.
(f) The facilities of the law enforcement academy shall be used to
provide the basic training under section 9(d) of this chapter of a special
officer of a consolidated city who is employed full time by the
consolidated city after June 30, 2023, to perform park ranger duties.
(g) The cost of the mandatory basic training conducted by the board
at the facilities of the law enforcement academy and all other training
programs authorized by this chapter and conducted at the law
enforcement training academy, including the mandatory basic training
course when attended by trainees who have been investigated and
approved but not yet hired by a law enforcement agency, are subject to
fee schedules and charges for tuition, lodging, meals, instructors,
training materials, and any other items or services established by the
board, including amounts needed to recoup corresponding marginal
and fixed costs. The costs and the fee schedule must be an annual
schedule for the state fiscal year and must be approved by the budget
director.
SECTION 7. IC 5-2-18.2-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.171-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "law enforcement
officer" has the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

19
(b) The term includes a member in the military police force of
the Indiana National Guard while exercising police powers in
accordance with IC 10-16-23-3.
SECTION 8. IC 5-2-20-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.171-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "law enforcement
officer" has the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
(b) The term includes a member in the military police force of
the Indiana National Guard while exercising police powers in
accordance with IC 10-16-23-3.
SECTION 9. IC 5-9-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Persons discharged from the armed forces of
the United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2), IC 10-17-12-8.1(2), by reason of disability
resulting from wounds or sickness incurred in the line of duty, shall be
preferred for appointment to civil offices, provided they are found to
possess the capacity necessary for the proper discharge of such offices.
SECTION 10. IC 5-9-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Political subdivisions of the state of Indiana
shall allow preference points to eligible armed forces veterans who are
being examined for full time employment. Preference points awarded
to such veterans on each such examination shall be ten percent (10%)
of the total number of points which may be obtained thereon.
(b) To be eligible to receive preference points, under this chapter,
a person must have:
(1) served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States
for at least one hundred eighty-one (181) days; and
(2) received a discharge from service under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(c) The provisions of this chapter are in lieu of any policy of a
political subdivision allowing employment preference for veterans in
effect before July 1, 1975.
SECTION 11. IC 5-10.3-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A member who:
(1) enters the United States armed services;
(2) leaves the member's contributions in the fund;
(3) except as provided in subsection (c), resumes service with the
member's employer within one hundred twenty (120) days after
the member's unconditional discharge; and
HEA 1343 — CC 1

20
(4) would be entitled to service credit for military service under
the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights
Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.) if the member had resumed service
with the member's employer within ninety (90) days after
discharge;
is entitled to service credit for the armed service.
(b) A state employee who left employment before January 1, 1946,
or an employee of a political subdivision who left employment before
the participation date, to enter the United States armed services is
entitled to service credit for the armed service if the member:
(1) except as provided in subsection (c), resumes service with the
employer within one hundred twenty (120) days after the
member's unconditional discharge; and
(2) would be entitled to service credit for military service under
the applicable requirements of federal law in effect at the time of
reemployment if the employee had resumed service with the
employee's employer within ninety (90) days after discharge.
(c) The board shall extend the one hundred twenty (120) day
reemployment requirement contained in subsection (a)(3) or (b)(1) if
the board determines that an illness, an injury, or a disability related to
the member's military service prevented the member from resuming
employment within one hundred twenty (120) days after the member's
discharge from military service. However, the board may not extend the
deadline beyond thirty (30) months after the member's discharge.
(d) If a member retires and the board subsequently determines that
the member is entitled to additional service credit due to the extension
of a deadline under subsection (c), the board shall recompute the
member's benefit. However, the additional service credit may be used
only in the computation of benefits to be paid after the date of the
board's determination, and the member is not entitled to a
recomputation of benefits received before the date of the board's
determination.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a member is
entitled to service credit and benefits in the amount and to the extent
required by the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment
Rights Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.).
(f) Subject to the provisions of this section, an active member may
purchase and claim not more than two (2) years of service credit for the
member's service on active duty in the armed services if the member
meets the following conditions:
(1) The member has at least one (1) year of credited service in the
fund.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

21
(2) The member serves on active duty in the armed services of the
United States for at least six (6) months.
(3) The member receives a discharge from the armed services
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(4) Before the member retires, the member makes contributions
to the fund as follows:
(A) Contributions that are equal to the product of the
following:
(i) The member's salary at the time the member actually
makes a contribution for the service credit.
(ii) A rate, determined by the actuary of the fund, that is
based on the age of the member at the time the member
actually makes a contribution for service credit and
computed to result in a contribution amount that
approximates the actuarial present value of the benefit
attributable to the service credit purchased.
(iii) The number of years of service credit the member
intends to purchase.
(B) Contributions for any accrued interest, at a rate determined
by the actuary of the fund, for the period from the member's
initial membership in the fund to the date payment is made by
the member.
However, a member is entitled to purchase service credit under this
subsection only to the extent that service credit is not granted for that
time under another provision of this section. At least ten (10) years of
service in Indiana is required before a member may receive a benefit
based on service credits purchased under this section. A member who
terminates employment before satisfying the eligibility requirements
necessary to receive a monthly allowance or receives a monthly
allowance for the same service from another tax supported public
employee retirement plan other than under the federal Social Security
Act may withdraw the purchase amount plus accumulated interest after
submitting a properly completed application for a refund to the fund.
(g) The following apply to the purchase of service credit under
subsection (f):
(1) The board may allow a member to make periodic payments of
the contributions required for the purchase of the service credit.
The board shall determine the length of the period during which
the payments must be made.
(2) The board may deny an application for the purchase of service
credit if the purchase would exceed the limitations under Section
HEA 1343 — CC 1

22
415 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) A member may not claim the service credit for purposes of
determining eligibility or computing benefits unless the member
has made all payments required for the purchase of the service
credit.
SECTION 12. IC 5-10.4-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This subsection applies to a member who
retires before July 1, 1980. A member who had completed four (4)
years of approved college teacher education before voluntary or
involuntary induction into the military services is entitled to credit for
that service as if the member had begun teaching before the induction.
A member who serves in military service is considered a teacher and
is entitled to the benefits of the fund if before or during the leave of
absence the member pays into the fund the member's contributions.
Time served by a member in military service for the duration of the
hostilities or for the length of active service in the hostilities and the
necessary demobilization time after the hostilities is not subject to the
one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to a member who retires after June 30,
1980. A member who completed four (4) years of approved college
teacher education before voluntary or involuntary induction into
military service is entitled to credit for the member's active military
service as if the member had begun teaching before the induction. A
member who serves in military service is considered a teacher and is
entitled to the benefits of the fund if the following conditions are met:
(1) The member has received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to
active teaching service not later than twenty-four (24) months
after the completion of active military service.
(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in military service for the duration of the
hostilities or for the length of active service in the hostilities and the
necessary demobilization time after the hostilities is not subject to the
one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter. However, not
more than six (6) years of military service credit may be granted under
this subsection.
(c) This subsection applies to a member who retires after May 1,
1989. A member who had begun but had not completed four (4) years
HEA 1343 — CC 1

23
of approved college teacher education before voluntary or involuntary
induction into the military services is entitled to service credit in an
amount equal to the duration of the member's active military service if
the following conditions are met:
(1) The member has received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to a
four (4) year approved college teacher training program not later
than twenty-four (24) months after the completion of active
military service and subsequently completes that program.
(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in active military service for the length
of active service in the hostilities and the necessary demobilization is
not subject to the one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
However, not more than six (6) years of military service credit may be
granted under this subsection.
(d) This subsection applies to a member who retires after May 1,
1991, and who is employed at a state educational institution. A member
who had begun but had not completed baccalaureate or
post-baccalaureate education before voluntary or involuntary induction
into military service is entitled to the member's active military service
credit for the member's active military service in an amount equal to
the duration of the member's military service if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The member received a discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to
baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate education not later than
twenty-four (24) months after completion of active military
service and subsequently completes that education.
(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in active military service for the length
of active service in the hostilities and the necessary demobilization is
not subject to the one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
However, not more than six (6) years of military service credit may be
granted under this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, a member returns to active teaching
service on the earlier of:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

24
(1) the date on which the member signs a teacher's contract; or
(2) the date on which the member is first employed in a position
covered by this article.
(f) For purposes of this section, a member returns to:
(1) a teacher training program; or
(2) baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate education;
on the date the member registers for or enrolls in classes that the
member attends.
(g) The board shall extend the twenty-four (24) month deadline
contained in subsection (b)(2), (c)(2), or (d)(2) if the board determines
that an illness, an injury, or a disability related to the member's military
service prevented the member from returning to active teaching service
or to a teacher education program not later than twenty-four (24)
months after the member's discharge from military service. However,
the board may not extend the deadline beyond forty-eight (48) months
after the member's discharge.
(h) If a member retires and the board subsequently determines that
the member is entitled to additional service credit due to the extension
of a deadline under subsection (g), the board shall recompute the
member's benefit. However, the additional service credit may be used
only in the computation of benefits to be paid after the date of the
board's determination, and the member is not entitled to a
recomputation of benefits received before the date of the board's
determination.
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a member is
entitled to military service credit and benefits in the amount and to the
extent required by the federal Uniformed Services Employment and
Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.), including all later
amendments.
(j) Subject to this section, an active member may purchase and
claim not more than two (2) years of service credit for the member's
service on active duty in the armed services if the member meets the
following conditions:
(1) The member has at least one (1) year of credited service in the
fund.
(2) The member serves on active duty in the armed services of the
United States for at least six (6) months.
(3) The member receives a discharge from the armed services
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(4) Before the member retires, the member makes contributions
to the fund as follows:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

25
(A) Contributions that are equal to the product of:
(i) the member's salary at the time the member actually
makes a contribution for the service credit;
(ii) a rate, determined by the actuary of the fund, that is
based on the age of the member at the time the member
actually makes a contribution for service credit and
computed to result in a contribution amount that
approximates the actuarial present value of the benefit
attributable to the service credit purchased; and
(iii) the number of years of service credit the member
intends to purchase.
(B) Contributions for any accrued interest, at a rate determined
by the actuary of the fund, for the period from the member's
initial membership in the fund to the date payment is made by
the member.
However, a member is entitled to purchase service credit under this
subsection only to the extent that service credit is not granted for that
time under another provision of this section. At least ten (10) years of
service in Indiana is required before a member may receive a benefit
based on service credits purchased under this section. A member who
terminates employment before satisfying the eligibility requirements
necessary to receive a monthly allowance or receives a monthly
allowance for the same service from another tax supported public
employee retirement plan other than under the federal Social Security
Act may withdraw the purchase amount plus accumulated interest after
submitting a properly completed application for a refund to the fund.
(k) The following apply to the purchase of service credit under
subsection (j):
(1) The board may allow a member to make periodic payments of
the contributions required for the purchase of the service credit.
The board shall determine the length of the period during which
the payments must be made.
(2) The board may deny an application for the purchase of service
credit if the purchase would exceed the limitations under Section
415 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) A member may not claim the service credit for purposes of
determining eligibility or computing benefits unless the member
has made all payments required for the purchase of the service
credit.
(l) This subsection applies to a member who retires after June 30,
2006. A member may not receive credit under this section for service
for which the member receives service credit under the terms of a
HEA 1343 — CC 1

26
military or another governmental retirement plan.
SECTION 13. IC 6-8.1-9-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Every individual (other than a nonresident)
who files an individual income tax return and who is entitled to a
refund from the department of state revenue because of the
overpayment of income tax for a taxable year may designate on the
individual's annual state income tax return that either a specific amount
or all of the refund to which the individual is entitled shall be paid over
to one (1) or more of the funds described in subsection (c). If the refund
to which the individual is entitled is less than the total amount
designated to be paid over to one (1) or more of the funds described in
subsection (c), all of the refund to which the individual is entitled shall
be paid over to the designated funds, but in an amount or amounts
reduced proportionately for each designated fund. If an individual
designates all of the refund to which the individual is entitled to be paid
over to one (1) or more of the funds described in subsection (c) without
designating specific amounts, the refund to which the individual is
entitled shall be paid over to each fund described in subsection (c) in
an amount equal to the refund divided by the number of funds
described in subsection (c), rounded to the lowest cent, with any part
of the refund remaining due to the effects of rounding to be deposited
in the nongame fund.
(b) Every husband and wife (other than nonresidents) who file a
joint income tax return and who are entitled to a refund from the
department of state revenue because of the overpayment of income tax
for a taxable year may designate on their annual state income tax return
that either a specific amount or all of the refund to which they are
entitled shall be paid over to one (1) or more of the funds described in
subsection (c). If the refund to which a husband and wife are entitled
is less than the total amount designated to be paid over to one (1) or
more of the funds described in subsection (c), all of the refund to which
the husband and wife are entitled shall be paid over to the designated
funds, but in an amount or amounts reduced proportionately for each
designated fund. If a husband and wife designate all of the refund to
which the husband and wife are entitled to be paid over to one (1) or
more of the funds described in subsection (c) without designating
specific amounts, the refund to which the husband and wife are entitled
shall be paid over to each fund described in subsection (c) in an
amount equal to the refund divided by the number of funds described
in subsection (c), rounded to the lowest cent, with any part of the
refund remaining due to the effects of rounding to be deposited in the
HEA 1343 — CC 1

27
nongame fund.
(c) Designations under subsection (a) or (b) may be directed only to
the following funds:
(1) The nongame fund.
(2) The state general fund for exclusive use in funding public
education for kindergarten through grade 12.
(3) The military family relief fund.
(d) The instructions for the preparation of individual income tax
returns shall contain a description of the purposes of the following:
(1) The nongame and endangered species program. The
description of this program shall be written in cooperation with
the department of natural resources.
(2) The funding of public education for kindergarten through
grade 12. The description of this purpose shall be written in
cooperation with the secretary of education.
(3) The funding for financial assistance to qualified service
members (as defined in IC 10-17-12-7.5) described in
IC 10-17-12-8.1(1) and IC 10-17-12-8.1(2), who are Indiana
residents, and their families. The description of this purpose shall
be written in cooperation with the Indiana department of veterans'
affairs.
(e) The department shall interpret a designation on a return under
subsection (a) or (b) that is illegible or otherwise not reasonably
discernible to the department as if the designation had not been made.
SECTION 14. IC 9-18.5-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) An Indiana resident who is a current or
former member of the Army or Air National Guard may apply for and
receive one (1) or more license plates under this chapter.
(b) An individual applying for a National Guard license plate under
this chapter as a current member of the National Guard must
demonstrate the individual's status as a current member of the Army or
Air National Guard by presenting the following with the individual's
application:
(1) A current United States armed forces identification card.
(2) A letter signed by the individual's commanding officer
identifying the individual as a current active member.
(c) An individual applying for a National Guard license plate under
this chapter as a former member of the National Guard must present
with the individual's application a copy of the individual's:
(1) National Guard Bureau Form 22 or 22A showing the
individual received a discharge under conditions other than
HEA 1343 — CC 1

28
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2); IC 10-17-12-8.1(2); or
(2) National Guard Bureau Form 23D or 23E showing the
individual as retired;
as proof of the individual's status as a former member of the Army or
Air National Guard.
SECTION 15. IC 10-13-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement
officer" means any of the following:
(1) A state police officer.
(2) A county sheriff.
(3) A county police officer.
(4) A correctional officer.
(5) An excise police officer.
(6) A county police reserve officer.
(7) A city police officer.
(8) A city police reserve officer.
(9) A conservation enforcement officer.
(10) A town marshal.
(11) A deputy town marshal.
(12) A probation officer.
(13) A state educational institution police officer appointed under
IC 21-39-4.
(14) A gaming agent of the Indiana gaming commission.
(15) A person employed by a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-13) and appointed as a special deputy under
IC 36-8-10-10.6.
(16) A school corporation police officer appointed under
IC 20-26-16.
(17) A police officer of a public or private postsecondary
educational institution whose board of trustees has established a
police department under IC 21-17-5-2 or IC 21-39-4-2.
(18) A tribal police officer.
(19) A hospital police officer employed by a hospital police
department established under IC 16-18-4.
(20) A conservancy district marshal.
(21) A deputy conservancy district marshal.
(22) A member in the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard while exercising police powers in accordance
with IC 10-16-23-3.
SECTION 16. IC 10-16-1-5.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
HEA 1343 — CC 1

29
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.6. "Civilian cyber corps" means
the Indiana civilian cyber corps program established by
IC 10-16-22.
SECTION 17. IC 10-16-1-5.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.7. "Civilian cyber corps
adviser" means an individual who serves as a nondeployable
member in the Indiana civilian cyber corps program for the
purpose of providing support and technical expertise for civilian
cyber corps volunteers.
SECTION 18. IC 10-16-1-5.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.8. "Civilian cyber corps
volunteer" means an individual who has entered into an agreement
with the adjutant general to serve as a deployable member in the
Indiana civilian cyber corps program.
SECTION 19. IC 10-16-1-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. "Cybersecurity client" means
a:
(1) state agency (as defined in IC 4-1-10-2);
(2) political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13);
(3) state educational institution (as defined in IC 21-7-13-32);
(4) critical infrastructure facility (as defined in
IC 35-46-10-1); or
(5) critical infrastructure utility (as defined in IC 35-46-10-1);
that has requested and is using the rapid response assistance of the
Indiana civilian cyber corps program under the direction of the
adjutant general.
SECTION 20. IC 10-16-1-8.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.6. "Cybersecurity incident"
means an incident as defined by 44 U.S.C. 3552(b)(2).
SECTION 21. IC 10-16-1-19.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.3. "State police department"
refers to the state police department established by IC 10-11-2-4.
SECTION 22. IC 10-16-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.15-2010,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The adjutant general shall appoint four (4)
assistant adjutants general additional general officers to serve at the
will and pleasure of the adjutant general as follows:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

30
(1) Excluding the adjutant general, there are six (6) general
officer authorizations for the Indiana Army National Guard
and two (2) general authorizations for the Indiana Air
National Guard under this section.
(2) Included in the general officer authorizations described in
subdivision (1), one (1) general officer position shall be
established as the Director, Joint Staff, Indiana Joint Forces
Headquarters. The position may be filled by either an Army
or Air National Guard member.
(3) To be eligible for appointment to a general officer under
subdivision (1), an individual must meet the following
requirements:
(A) The individual must be a federally recognized officer
who has attained the rank of colonel or higher.
(B) The individual must be eligible for appointment in the
Indiana National Guard.
(1) One (1) assistant adjutant general from the Indiana Army
National Guard to be commander of the Indiana Army National
Guard forces, except the forces described in subdivision (3). A
person is not eligible for appointment as assistant adjutant general
unless the person is a member of the Indiana Army National
Guard and has attained the rank of major or above. The person
must be a federally recognized officer and may hold the rank of
major general or other rank authorized by the table of
organization for the Army National Guard.
(2) One (1) assistant adjutant general from the Indiana Army
National Guard to be chief of staff to the adjutant general for all
the Indiana Army National Guard forces, except those forces
described in subdivision (4). This assistant adjutant general shall
perform duties assigned by the adjutant general and is responsible
for all administrative and operational functions of the Indiana
Army National Guard, except those related to forces described in
subdivision (4). A person is not eligible for appointment as
assistant adjutant general unless the person is a member of the
Indiana Army National Guard with at least six (6) years service in
the Indiana Army National Guard and has attained the rank of
major or above. The person must be a federally recognized officer
and may hold the rank of brigadier general or other rank
authorized by the table of organization for the Army National
Guard.
(3) One (1) assistant adjutant general from the Indiana Air
National Guard to be chief of staff to the adjutant general for all
HEA 1343 — CC 1

31
the Indiana Air National Guard forces. This assistant adjutant
general shall perform duties assigned by the adjutant general and
is responsible for administrative and operational functions of the
Indiana Air National Guard. A person is not eligible for
appointment as air forces chief of staff unless the person is a
member of the Indiana Air National Guard with at least six (6)
years service as a commissioned officer and has attained the rank
of major or above. The person must be a federally recognized
officer and may hold the rank of brigadier general or other rank
authorized by the tables of organization for the Air National
Guard.
(4) One (1) assistant adjutant general from the Indiana Army
National Guard to be chief of staff to the adjutant general for all
Indiana Army National Guard forces assigned to the Camp
Atterbury Muscatatuck Urban Training Center. This assistant
adjutant general shall perform duties assigned by the adjutant
general and is responsible for all administrative and operational
functions of Indiana Army National Guard forces assigned to the
Camp Atterbury Muscatatuck Urban Training Center. A person
is not eligible for appointment as assistant adjutant general unless
the person is a member of the Indiana Army National Guard with
at least six (6) years service in the Indiana Army National Guard
and has attained the rank of major or above. The person must be
a federally recognized officer and may hold the rank of brigadier
general or other rank authorized by the table of organization for
the Army National Guard.
SECTION 23. IC 10-16-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The state armory board established by section
1 of this chapter may contribute funds in support of the following
authorized duties and responsibilities of the adjutant general:
(1) The military department of the Indiana ceremonial unit.
(2) The Indiana guard reserve.
(3) The annual report of the adjutant general's department.
(4) The medical treatment, pensions, and funeral expenses of
officers and soldiers wounded, disabled, or killed while in the
active service of the state.
(5) Expenditures for public relations and the promotion of morale
within the adjutant general's department. that are not paid by the
United States Department of Defense.
(6) Recruitment and retention expenditures of the adjutant
general's department. that are not paid by the United States
HEA 1343 — CC 1

32
Department of Defense.
(7) The publication of the armed forces law of Indiana in
accordance with IC 10-16-2-9(d).
(8) Armory modernization and care for armories.
SECTION 24. IC 10-16-3-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The state armory board may utilize any and
all appropriate methods to:
(1) lease real estate from:
(A) the federal, the state, or a local government; or
(B) a federal, state, or local agency; or
(C) a private entity or individual; or
(2) purchase real estate throughout the state;
where necessary to provide armories or other military purposes.
(b) The state armory board shall lease or purchase real estate in the
name and for the use of the state. The state armory board may erect on
the real estate an armory or another appropriate structure to be used for
meetings, rendezvous, and drill purposes by the following
organizations:
(1) A company.
(2) A battery.
(3) A troop.
(4) A battalion.
(5) A regiment.
(6) A division organization.
(7) An air squadron. wing.
(8) A related group.
(9) An organization authorized by the state board.
The ordnance stores, quartermaster stores, and other property issued to
an organization described in this subsection and occupying the armory
shall be stored in the armory or other appropriate structure.
(c) The state armory board shall arrange for the occupancy and use
of the armories under the direction and responsibility of the senior
officer in command of an organization described in subsection (b).
(d) An armory may not be erected on land that is leased for less than
fifty (50) twenty-five (25) years.
(e) The Indiana wing of the civil air patrol and its subordinate units
may use armory facilities without charge when the officer responsible
for the armory determines the use would not interfere with operational
training requirements of the military forces concerned.
SECTION 25. IC 10-16-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HEA 1343 — CC 1

33
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The state armory board shall constitute a board
for the general management, care, and custody of the armories. The
state armory board may adopt rules policies or procedures for:
(1) the management and government of the armories;
(2) the guidance of the organizations occupying the armories; and
(3) any other purpose consistent with this chapter.
SECTION 26. IC 10-16-3-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) This section applies if a contract for the procurement
of property by the state armory board or a local armory board is
awarded under this chapter by acceptance of bids, proposals, or
quotations.
(b) A bid, proposal, or quotation submitted by a trust (as defined in
IC 30-4-1-1(a)) must identify each:
(1) beneficiary of the trust; and
(2) settlor empowered to revoke or modify the trust.
SECTION 27. IC 10-16-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The state armory board may receive from
any source donations of real or personal property or contributions of
money to aid in the support and assistance of:
(1) the armed forces of Indiana; and
(2) the armed forces of Indiana called or inducted into federal
service.
Property received under this subsection shall be held as other property
for the use of the state.
(b) Counties, cities, and municipalities may make donations and
contributions under subsection (a).
(c) This subsection applies to real or personal any property:
(1) donated under subsection (a); and
(2) upon which the state of Indiana has not erected structures; and
(3) if a donation agreement has not been executed between the
state armory and the donor of the property.
The state armory board may determine that real any property donated
under subsection (a) is no longer usable or cannot be used by the
military department. The state armory board may certify its
determination to the adjutant general. The adjutant general may
reconvey the real any property to the donor or to another entity or
individual that the adjutant general considers appropriate.
SECTION 28. IC 10-16-3-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. All expenses
incurred in the operation of state armories shall be paid out of:
(1) the rentals;
HEA 1343 — CC 1

34
(2) the income;
(3) the earnings;
(4) any other receipts; and
(5) any other appropriation provided by law;
to pay the expenses incurred in the operation of the armories or other
matters consistent with this chapter.
SECTION 29. IC 10-16-3-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) If the state
armory board receives from the governor adjutant general information
of the disbandment of the organization of the armed forces of Indiana
occupying and using an armory, the state armory board shall take
charge of the armory.
(b) The state armory board shall sell the armory for the highest price
at public or private sale after publication of the sale for a period of ten
(10) days and return the proceeds into the state treasury.
SECTION 30. IC 10-16-3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The state armory board may:
(1) sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any real property
belonging to the state and being under the charge and in the
custody and possession of the state armory board if, in the
judgment of the state armory board:
(1) (A) the real property can no longer be used for the purpose
for which it was acquired; and
(2) (B) the conveyance provides a substantial public or
military benefit; or
(2) elect to transfer the property to the Indiana department of
administration under IC 4-20.5-7 or IC 5-22-21.
(b) The sale shall be made at public or private sale, after appropriate
publication, for the highest price to be obtained for the same. If the
state armory board takes bids in the sale of real property, the board
shall require a bid submitted by a trust (as defined in IC 30-4-1-1(a))
to identify all of the following:
(1) Each beneficiary of the trust.
(2) Each settlor empowered to revoke or modify the trust.
(c) All money derived from the sale, conveyance, or other
disposition of any real property shall be paid into the state treasury, but
may be used for the purchase of other real property for armory
purposes.
SECTION 31. IC 10-16-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2011,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), if
HEA 1343 — CC 1

35
the state armory board sells any real property, the value of the property
shall be determined by an appraiser three (3) disinterested appraisers
appointed by the state armory board with the approval of the adjutant
general. governor.
(b) Real property may not be sold for less than the appraised value
of the real property unless the sale is approved by the adjutant
general. If the real property cannot be sold at its appraised value, it
may be reappraised.
(c) If the adjutant general determines that the value of the real
property is likely to be less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000),
the appraisal described in subsection (a) is not required to sell the
real property.
(d) The state armory board may transfer state real property to
a person in exchange for property of like value that is transferred
by the person to the state. The state armory board must establish
that properties exchanged are of like value through appraisals or
other means approved by the adjutant general.
(c) (e) Real property may not be sold or transferred unless:
(1) the governor adjutant general approves the sale or transfer;
and
(2) the attorney general state armory board's legal counsel
states in writing that all the conditions necessary to the legal and
valid sale or transfer of the property have been fully complied
with.
SECTION 32. IC 10-16-3-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 316, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The purchaser of real
property sold under this chapter or to whom real property is conveyed
or otherwise disposed of under this chapter shall pay the purchase
money as agreed upon and certified by to the state armory board to the
treasurer of state for the use and benefit of the state armory board. The
purchaser shall take the receipt of the treasurer of state.
(b) The state comptroller armory board shall execute a deed of
conveyance to the purchaser or the exchanging party after the
purchaser or the exchanging party presents a form that is legally
sufficient to memorialize and consummate the transaction and that
is suitable for recording in the county upon which the property is
located. presents the following documents to the state comptroller:
(1) The receipt of the treasurer of state.
(2) A certified resolution approved by the state armory board
setting forth the terms and conditions of the sale, conveyance, or
other disposition.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

36
The deed of conveyance shall be signed by the governor president of
the state armory board and officially attested by the adjutant
general. state comptroller with the seal of the state.
SECTION 33. IC 10-16-3-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 317, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The state armory board shall
report annually of the proceedings incident to the location and
management of the armories and a detailed account of disbursements.
(b) The report shall be filed in the office of the state comptroller
with the state board of accounts and a copy furnished to the adjutant
general for publication in the annual report of the adjutant general's
department.
SECTION 34. IC 10-16-3-17 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. The adjutant
general's office state examiner, personally or through the deputy
examiners, field examiners, or private examiners, shall make a full and
complete examination and report of all transactions of all individuals,
persons, trustees, boards, banks, firms, corporations, and others
engaged in the acquisition of sites for and the construction of state
armories, including examination of the following:
(1) The plans and specifications of armories.
(2) Construction work performed or being performed.
(3) The records of bonds issued and redeemed or proposed to be
issued.
(4) The records of all lease contracts for building or maintaining
armories.
(5) The records of receipts and earnings of all armories, except
those earnings and receipts arising from shows, benefits, and
other similar activities engaged in by members of the armories
and other volunteers for the use and benefit of the members.
(6) All money handled by the board or boards, by trustees of state
armories, by the state armory board or local armory boards, or by
the adjutant general, including all appropriations made for
armories by the general assembly.
All powers conferred upon the state examiner, deputy examiner, field
examiner, private examiner, and the attorney general under IC 5-11-6
by petition are conferred upon these officers, examiners, and the
department without any petition. All the powers given these officers,
examiners, and the department under any other statute may be used for
the purpose of carrying out this chapter.
SECTION 35. IC 10-16-3-18 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) The state
HEA 1343 — CC 1

37
armory board examiner, with the approval of the governor, may
employ expert engineering and architectural services when necessary
to assist the state armory board examiner, deputy examiner, field
examiners, or private examiners in making inspections and
examinations under this chapter.
(b) The state examiner, with the approval of the governor, shall fix
and determine the amount to be paid for the expert service. Field
examiners of the state board of accounts, when employed in performing
the services provided for in this chapter, are entitled to receive the per
diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2 and IC 4-10-11-2.1 for field examiners
and all necessary expenses incurred in carrying out their duties as
provided for in this chapter.
SECTION 36. IC 10-16-6-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A person may not
be commissioned as an officer of the Indiana national guard unless the
person:
(1) is temperate and of good moral character; and
(2) has successfully passed tests as to physical, mental, and
professional fitness as may be prescribed by the laws and
regulations applicable to the federally recognized national guard.
(b) In the selection and appointment of commissioned officers,
preference shall be given to:
(1) a person with prior active military service;
(2) an enlisted person;
(3) a member of the army or air national guard; and
(4) a graduate of a school teaching military science.
SECTION 37. IC 10-16-6-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) A commissioned officer:
(1) who serves in the Indiana national guard for at least five (5)
years; or
(2) who becomes permanently disabled from performing the
officer's duties, irrespective of length of service;
may, upon retirement from the military service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2), IC 10-17-12-8.1(2),
whether by resignation or otherwise, and upon application to the
adjutant general, be carried upon a roll to be established and
maintained in the office of the adjutant general. The roll shall be
designated the Indiana national guard retired list.
(b) The commissioned officer may wear, on occasion of ceremony,
the uniform of the highest rank held by the officer.
(c) An officer carried on the Indiana national guard retired list, if
HEA 1343 — CC 1

38
qualified, is eligible for detail or appointment on the general staff or the
staff of any commander when not physically disqualified for military
duty. However, if an officer carried on the Indiana national guard
retired list is appointed to a staff position as described in this section,
the officer shall be recommissioned in the rank to which the officer has
been appointed. The officer shall hold this rank during the time of the
staff appointment unless the officer is promoted to a higher rank.
(d) If the officer retires for a second time from active service, the
officer shall be entered on the Indiana national guard retired list with
the officer's highest rank.
(e) An officer whose name appears on the national guard retired list
is not entitled to receive any military pay or emolument from the state
during the time the officer remains on the national guard retired list
unless the officer is specifically assigned to duty on orders from the
governor. If the officer is assigned to duty on orders from the governor,
the officer is entitled only to the military pay and allowance provided
by law for officers of the rank to which appointed.
SECTION 38. IC 10-16-18-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 1. A contract may not be entered into by the adjutant
general or the armory board that provides for the use of Stout Field,
Indianapolis, for purposes of commercial flying by transportation
companies.
SECTION 39. IC 10-16-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Indiana Cyber Civilian Corps Program Advisory Board).
SECTION 40. IC 10-16-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22. Indiana Civilian Cyber Corps Program
Sec. 1. (a) The Indiana civilian cyber corps program is
established as a subdivision of the Indiana guard reserve organized
and maintained under IC 10-16-8 with the primary mission of
increasing cybersecurity awareness, capability, and capacity
throughout Indiana. The secondary mission of the civilian cyber
corps is to provide rapid response capabilities for cybersecurity
clients that would otherwise be unable to appropriately:
(1) respond to;
(2) mitigate; or
(3) recover from;
a cybersecurity incident.
(b) The adjutant general shall administer the civilian cyber
corps program.
(c) The following state agencies shall designate a liaison to the
HEA 1343 — CC 1

39
civilian cyber corps:
(1) The office of technology established by IC 4-13.1-2-1.
(2) The department of homeland security established by
IC 10-19-2-1.
(3) The state police department.
Sec. 2. (a) The adjutant general may invite and appoint an
individual who has expertise in addressing cybersecurity incidents
to serve as a civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber corps
adviser in a manner prescribed by the adjutant general.
(b) The adjutant general shall require an individual who accepts
an invitation to serve as a civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian
cyber corps adviser under subsection (a) to submit to a criminal
history check.
Sec. 3. (a) A civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber
corps adviser is not an agent, employee, or independent contractor
of the state of Indiana for any purpose and has no authority to bind
the state of Indiana with regard to third parties.
(b) The state of Indiana is not liable to a civilian cyber corps
volunteer or civilian cyber corps adviser for personal injury or
property damage suffered by the civilian cyber corps volunteer or
civilian cyber corps adviser through participation in the civilian
cyber corps.
Sec. 4. (a) The adjutant general, the military department, and
the state of Indiana are immune from tort liability for acts or
omissions by a civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber
corps adviser as provided in this chapter.
(b) A civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber corps
adviser is subject to the same civil and criminal immunity
protections as a member of the Indiana National Guard under
IC 10-16-7-7(b) and IC 10-16-7-7(d) for any act done by the civilian
cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber corps adviser in the
discharge of the civilian cyber corps volunteer's or civilian cyber
corps adviser's official duty under this chapter.
Sec. 5. The civilian cyber corps shall conduct:
(1) an annual meeting that meets at the call of the adjutant
general; and
(2) critical incident training or exercises at the call of the
adjutant general.
Sec. 6. (a) A cybersecurity client may request cybersecurity
training by the civilian cyber corps by submitting a request to the
civilian cyber corps in a manner prescribed by the adjutant
general.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

40
(b) To initiate the deployment of a civilian cyber corps volunteer
to provide training to a cybersecurity client, the adjutant general
shall indicate in writing that the civilian cyber corps volunteer is
authorized to provide training to the cybersecurity client.
(c) The adjutant general may enter into a contract with a
cybersecurity client as a condition of providing training to the
cybersecurity client through the civilian cyber corps.
(d) Acceptance by a cybersecurity client of training from a
civilian cyber corps volunteer under this chapter must be made by
the cybersecurity client in writing.
(e) The adjutant general shall maintain a written document
initiating the deployment of a civilian cyber corps volunteer to
provide training to a cybersecurity client for:
(1) six (6) years after the end of the deployment; or
(2) the length of time required under the adjutant general's
record retention policies;
whichever is longer.
Sec. 7. (a) A cybersecurity client:
(1) shall notify the state police department upon the
occurrence of a cybersecurity incident before requesting
response capabilities of the civilian cyber corps; and
(2) may, upon recognition of a potential security vulnerability
that could lead to a cybersecurity incident, request the
adjutant general to deploy one (1) or more civilian cyber
corps volunteers to provide rapid response assistance to the
cybersecurity client.
(b) The adjutant general may, at the adjutant general's
discretion, initiate:
(1) the deployment of a civilian cyber corps volunteer; or
(2) the nondeployment of a civilian cyber corps adviser;
upon recognition of a potential security vulnerability that could
lead to a cybersecurity incident and at the request of the
cybersecurity client.
(c) To initiate the deployment of a civilian cyber corps volunteer
to provide assistance to a cybersecurity client, the adjutant general
shall indicate in writing that the civilian cyber corps volunteer is
authorized to provide assistance to the cybersecurity client. A
single written document may initiate the deployment of more than
one (1) civilian cyber corps volunteer.
(d) The adjutant general may enter into a contract with a
cybersecurity client as a condition of providing assistance to the
cybersecurity client through the civilian cyber corps.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

41
(e) Acceptance by a cybersecurity client of assistance from a
civilian cyber corps volunteer under this chapter shall be made by
the cybersecurity client in writing.
(f) The adjutant general shall maintain a written document
initiating the deployment of a civilian cyber corps volunteer to
provide assistance to a cybersecurity client for:
(1) six (6) years after the end of the deployment; or
(2) the length of time required under the adjutant general's
record retention policies;
whichever is longer.
(g) At the discretion of the adjutant general, the deployment of
a civilian cyber corps volunteer may be extended in writing in the
same manner as the initial deployment.
Sec. 8. (a) The adjutant general shall publish guidelines for the
operation of the civilian cyber corps program. At a minimum, the
published guidelines must include the following:
(1) An explanation of the standards the adjutant general will
use to determine whether an individual may serve as a civilian
cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber corps adviser and an
explanation of the process by which an individual may
become a civilian cyber corps volunteer or civilian cyber
corps adviser.
(2) An explanation of the requirements the adjutant general
will impose when a cybersecurity client requests and receives
the assistance of the civilian cyber corps.
(3) An explanation of the process by which the civilian cyber
corps will select and prioritize cybersecurity clients
requesting assistance.
(b) The adjutant general may provide, or contract for the
provision of, appropriate training to members of the civilian cyber
corps.
(c) The military department may provide compensation for
actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses incurred by
a civilian cyber corps volunteer on a deployment.
(d) The adjutant general may establish a fee schedule for
assistance provided by the civilian cyber corps.
Sec. 9. (a) Information that is voluntarily given to the civilian
cyber corps or obtained under this chapter that would identify or
provide as a means of identifying a person or cybersecurity client,
and the disclosure of which may:
(1) cause the person or cybersecurity client to become a victim
of a cybersecurity incident; or
HEA 1343 — CC 1

42
(2) disclose a person's or cybersecurity client's cybersecurity
plans or cybersecurity related practices, procedures, methods,
results, organizational information system infrastructure,
hardware, or software;
is confidential and exempt from disclosure under IC 5-14-3-4.
(b) The work product of a civilian cyber corps volunteer or
civilian cyber corps adviser under this chapter is confidential and
exempt from disclosure under IC 5-14-3-4.
SECTION 41. IC 10-16-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 23. Military Police Force of the Indiana National
Guard
Sec. 1. The adjutant general may establish a military police
force of the Indiana National Guard.
Sec. 2. (a) Before granting police powers to an individual
appointed as a member of the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard, the adjutant general shall validate that the
individual has a current security clearance and has not been
convicted of a felony.
(b) An individual appointed to serve in the military police force
of the Indiana National Guard may not exercise police powers until
the individual successfully completes either army or air military
police occupational training and receives qualifying instruction on
Indiana law enforcement prescribed by the adjutant general.
(c) An individual appointed to the military police force of the
Indiana National Guard shall take an appropriate oath of office in
the form and manner prescribed by the governor.
Sec. 3. The governor may authorize the military police force of
the Indiana National Guard to exercise police powers throughout
Indiana, or in any part of Indiana prescribed by the governor, if
the governor orders the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard to state active duty under IC 10-16-7-7. The
governor shall provide reasonable notice to local law enforcement
agencies affected by the deployment of the military police force of
the Indiana National Guard and coordinate with local law
enforcement agencies as circumstances permit.
Sec. 4. Upon the governor's authorization under section 3 of this
chapter, the military police force of the Indiana National Guard
shall respond:
(1) in accordance with the National Incident Management
System; and
HEA 1343 — CC 1

43
(2) in coordination with the Indiana state police.
Sec. 5. An individual serving in the military police force of the
Indiana National Guard who is authorized to exercise police
powers under section 3 of this chapter may:
(1) make an arrest;
(2) conduct a search or seizure of a person or property;
(3) carry a firearm; and
(4) exercise other police powers with respect to the
enforcement of Indiana laws.
SECTION 42. IC 10-17-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (h), a county executive
shall employ a service officer and may employ service officer assistants
to serve the veterans of the county. However, with the approval of the
commission, two (2) or more counties may enter into an agreement to
employ a service officer if each county demonstrates to the commission
that the workload does not justify each county employing a separate
county service officer.
(b) Subject to subsection (h), the mayor of a city may employ a
service officer and may employ service officer assistants to serve the
veterans of the city.
(c) The service officer shall:
(1) be:
(A) a veteran who received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) IC 10-17-12-8.1(2) and who has at least
six (6) months of active service in the armed forces of the
United States; or
(B) a service officer assistant with not less than two (2) years
of experience; and
(2) be a resident of Indiana or become a resident of Indiana not
more than six (6) months after the service officer's start date.
(d) A service officer assistant must be a resident of Indiana or
become a resident of Indiana not later than six (6) months after the
service officer assistant's start date and:
(1) satisfy the requirements specified in subsection (c)(1); or
(2) be the spouse, surviving spouse, parent, or child of a person
who satisfies the requirements specified in subsection (c)(1).
(e) A rule contrary to subsection (c) or (d) is void.
(f) County and city fiscal bodies may appropriate funds necessary
for the purposes described in this section.
(g) Every county or city official and department of the county or city
HEA 1343 — CC 1

44
shall cooperate with the service officer and shall provide the service
officer with information necessary in connection with the performance
of the service officer's duties. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require a county or city to share information that is
otherwise considered confidential in accordance with law.
(h) After June 30, 2026, a service officer must be accredited by the
department in order to provide service to veterans on behalf of the
county or city.
SECTION 43. IC 10-17-1-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The following employees of the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs must satisfy the requirements set forth
in section 5(a) of this chapter:
(1) State service officers.
(2) Director of the state approving agency.
(3) Director of the Indiana state veterans' cemetery established by
IC 10-17-11-4.
(b) An employee of the Indiana department of veterans' affairs not
described in subsection (a) must be an Indiana resident who:
(1) satisfy; received an honorable discharge from the armed
forces of the United States or the national guard (as defined
in IC 5-9-4-4); or
(2) be is the spouse, surviving spouse, parent, or child of a person
who satisfies the requirements set forth in section 5(a) of this
chapter. subdivision (1).
SECTION 44. IC 10-17-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The superintendent may not appoint or employ
a person in an office or a place in the Indiana Veterans' Home because
of the political views or affiliation of the appointee or employee or for
a reason other than capacity and fitness for the duties to be performed
by the appointee or employee. However, among applicants for
appointment found capable and fit, preference shall be given to a
military veteran who received a discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2)
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2), and the spouse, widow, widower, mother, and
child of a military veteran who received a discharge from military
service under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
SECTION 45. IC 10-17-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this section, "eligible person"
HEA 1343 — CC 1

45
refers to either of the following:
(1) A member of the uniformed services who was discharged
from the uniformed services under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) The spouse or surviving spouse of a member of the uniformed
services who was discharged from the uniformed services under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(b) An eligible person who has a disability is eligible for admission
to the home if:
(1) the eligible person is a resident of Indiana or establishes
residency in Indiana not later than six (6) months after admission
to the home; or
(2) in the case of an eligible person referred to in subsection
(a)(1), the eligible person was a resident of Indiana when the
eligible person enlisted in the uniformed services.
(c) The Indiana department of veterans' affairs shall adopt rules
concerning admission to the home.
(d) In adopting rules governing the admission, maintenance, and
discharge of members of the home, the Indiana department of veterans'
affairs may establish a fund called the veterans' home comfort and
welfare fund. The director shall deposit all money collected from the
members for the cost of their care and maintenance in the fund. The
director shall expend this money in any manner that adds to the comfort
and welfare of the members of the institutions.
(e) A part of the veterans' home comfort and welfare fund may be
withdrawn and deposited in a special fund called the veterans' home
building fund. The veterans' home building fund shall be used for the
construction, maintenance, remodeling, or repair of buildings of the
home.
(f) Preference under this section may be given to a person who
served in an Indiana military organization. Except in cases where the
surviving spouse of a veteran marries another veteran, the benefits of
this chapter extend only to a surviving spouse and the spouse of a
veteran if the contract of marriage was entered into more than five (5)
years before the date of death of the veteran. Except as otherwise
provided by law, upon the death of a person in the home, money paid
to the person or due to the person from a bank, a trust company, a
corporation, or an individual becomes an asset of the person's estate
and shall be distributed in the manner prescribed by the probate law of
the state.
SECTION 46. IC 10-17-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
HEA 1343 — CC 1

46
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) In order for an interested person to qualify
for an allowance under this chapter:
(1) the decedent must have been an Indiana resident at the time of
death and must have:
(A) received a discharge from the armed forces of the United
States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2); IC 10-17-12-8.1(2); or
(B) died while serving in the armed forces of the United
States; or
(2) the decedent must have been the spouse or surviving spouse
of a person described in subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(B) and must
have been an Indiana resident at the time of death.
(b) An interested person must file a claim for an allowance under
this chapter with the board of commissioners in the county of residence
of the decedent described in subsection (a). The claim must include:
(1) the fact of the service, death, and discharge if discharged from
service before death; and
(2) that the body has been buried in a decent and respectable
manner in a cemetery or burial ground or that the body has been
cremated and the cremains have not been interred.
(c) The board of commissioners shall hear and determine the claim
like other claims and, if the facts averred are found to be true, shall
allow the claim in an amount set by ordinance. However, the amount
of the allowance may not be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 47. IC 10-17-12-0.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2023,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. The purpose of the fund established in section
8 of this chapter is to provide short term financial assistance to families
of qualified service members. qualifying applicants for housing,
utilities, medical services, basic transportation, child care,
education, employment, food, and other essential family support
expenses that qualifying applicants are not otherwise able to
afford.
SECTION 48. IC 10-17-12-7.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 7.5. As used in this chapter, "qualified service member"
means an individual who is an Indiana resident and who:
(1) is serving on active duty in:
(A) the armed forces of the United States; or
(B) the national guard (as defined in IC 5-9-4-4); or
(2) has served in or been discharged from the armed forces of the
United States or the national guard under conditions other than
HEA 1343 — CC 1

47
the following:
(A) Discharge by court martial.
(B) Acceptance of a discharge to avoid a court martial.
(C) Discharge for having committed any of the following:
(i) An offense against the security of the United States,
including spying, mutiny, or treason.
(ii) An act of willful or persistent misconduct, including
desertion.
(iii) A sexual or violent offense against another person,
including molestation, rape, or assault.
(iv) An act described on the list of disallowable separation
codes adopted under section 10.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 49. IC 10-17-12-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2020,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The military family relief fund is
established. to provide short term assistance with food, housing,
utilities, medical services, basic transportation, child care, education,
employment or workforce, and other essential family support expenses
that have become difficult to afford for qualified service members or
dependents of qualified service members.
(b) Except as provided in section 9 of this chapter, the department
shall expend the money in the fund exclusively to provide grants for
assistance as described in subsection (a). section 0.7 of this chapter.
(c) The department shall give priority to applications for grants for
assistance from the fund to qualified service members or dependents
of qualified service members applicants who have never received a
grant under this chapter.
(d) Subject to the approval of the budget agency, the commission
shall establish the maximum total dollar amount of grants that may be
expended in a state fiscal year. Once the maximum total dollar amount
of grants that may be expended in a state fiscal year is reached, no
additional grants may be authorized until the start of the following state
fiscal year.
(e) The director shall each year provide a report to the budget
committee concerning the grant program under this chapter.
(f) A qualified service member or the qualified service member's
dependent may be eligible to receive assistance from the fund.
(g) (f) The commission shall administer the fund.
(g) The department shall report to the commission, at least
quarterly, on the status of all applications filed during the previous
quarter.
SECTION 50. IC 10-17-12-8.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
HEA 1343 — CC 1

48
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.1. To be eligible for a grant
from the fund, an applicant must be an Indiana resident who meets
at least one (1) of the following conditions:
(1) Is serving in:
(A) the armed forces of the United States; or
(B) the national guard (as defined in IC 5-9-4-4).
(2) Has served in or been discharged from the armed forces of
the United States or the national guard under conditions other
than the following:
(A) Discharge by court martial.
(B) Acceptance of a discharge to avoid a court martial.
(C) Discharge for having committed any of the following:
(i) An offense against the security of the United States,
including spying, mutiny, or treason.
(ii) An act of willful or persistent misconduct, including
desertion.
(iii) A sexual or violent offense against another person,
including molestation, rape, or assault.
(iv) An act described on the list of disallowable
separation codes adopted under section 10.5 of this
chapter.
(3) Is the dependent of an individual described in subdivision
(1) or (2).
SECTION 51. IC 10-17-12-8.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.3. (a) The department shall
make a comprehensive assessment of an applicant's financial
condition and needs when making a determination regarding an
award from the fund.
(b) The department shall use the most recently available poverty
guidelines set forth by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services in the evaluation of an applicant's financial
eligibility.
(c) The applicant's federal gross income or combined federal
gross income of the applicant and the applicant's spouse shall be
calculated at the time of the application and be based on the two (2)
most recent consecutive pay stubs. The department shall use this
calculation to annualize the applicant's and the applicant's spouse's
federal gross income.
(d) An applicant may not be eligible for assistance from the fund
if the applicant's federal gross income, or the combined federal
HEA 1343 — CC 1

49
gross income of the applicant and the applicant's spouse, exceeds
two (2) times the poverty guideline unless the commission approves
an income waiver under subsection (e).
(e) The commission may waive the income threshold if the
applicant requests a waiver in writing to the commission. The
applicant must provide a statement letter and supporting
documentation setting forth the reasons why a waiver should be
granted.
(f) The department shall consider other income or assets
available to the applicant and the applicant's spouse and determine
a threshold concerning the allowable amount of available assets.
The asset limits shall be posted on the department's website.
SECTION 52. IC 10-17-12-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) An applicant must
establish that the applicant has incurred a genuine hardship to be
eligible to receive assistance from the fund. The hardship incurred
by the applicant must:
(1) directly impact the applicant's most central and basic
living needs; and
(2) not be a consequence of the applicant's own actions or
choices, including discretionary expenditures on nonessential
goods or services.
(b) The department shall not make an award from the fund to
cover luxury, entertainment, recreational, or other nonessential
expenses.
SECTION 53. IC 10-17-12-8.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.8. (a) The department or
commission may impose stipulations or conditions concerning an
applicant seeking an award from the fund.
(b) If an applicant fails to satisfy any of the stipulations or
conditions set forth by the department or commission, all
applications submitted by the applicant shall be denied until the
stipulation or condition is satisfactorily completed.
(c) The stipulations or conditions may include:
(1) meaningful engagement with the department of workforce
development established by IC 22-4.1-2-1;
(2) completion of a financial education course provided by the
department; or
(3) providing receipts from previous awards from the fund
that evidence the award was used in accordance with the
HEA 1343 — CC 1

50
conditions or stipulations of the previous awards.
(d) If the department determines that the applicant made a
material misrepresentation during the application process, the
application shall be denied. Any future application submitted by
the applicant shall be reviewed by the commission.
SECTION 54. IC 10-17-12-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 for the provision of grants under this chapter. Subject to
subsection (b), the rules adopted under this section must address the
following:
(1) Uniform need determination procedures.
(2) (1) Eligibility criteria. including income eligibility standards,
asset limit eligibility standards, and other standards concerning
when assistance may be provided.
(3) (2) Application procedures.
(4) Selection procedures.
(5) (3) A consideration of the extent to which an individual has
used assistance available from other assistance programs before
assistance may be provided to the individual from the fund.
(6) (4) Other areas in which the commission determines that rules
are necessary to ensure the uniform administration of the grant
program under this chapter.
(b) The following apply to grants awarded under this chapter:
(1) The income eligibility standards must be based on the federal
gross income of the qualified service member and the qualified
service member's spouse.
(2) An employee of the department who is otherwise eligible for
a grant from the fund must submit the employee's application
directly to the commission for review. The department shall have
no influence in any part of the employee's application.
(3) (1) The maximum amount a qualified service member an
individual may receive from the fund is two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500), unless a higher amount is approved by
the commission.
(4) (2) The commission may consider the following in its analysis
of the applicant's request for assistance in excess of two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500):
(A) The department's eligibility determination of the applicant.
(B) Facts considered in the department's need determination.
review and award under 915 IAC 3-6-3 and 915 IAC 3-6-5.
(C) The circumstances surrounding the applicant's hardship,
HEA 1343 — CC 1

51
if applicable.
(D) Any substantive changes in the applicant's financial
situation after the original application was submitted.
(E) Facts that may have been unknown or unavailable at the
time of the applicant's original application for assistance.
(F) Other compelling circumstances that may justify assistance
in excess of the two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500)
threshold.
(3) An employee of the department who is otherwise eligible
for a grant from the fund must submit the employee's
application directly to the commission for review. The
department shall have no influence in any part of the
employee's application.
(5) (4) The commission shall approve or deny within sixty (60)
days an application for a grant filed with the commission after
June 30, 2019, by an employee of the department. The
commission shall return an incomplete application with a notation
as to omissions. The return of an incomplete application shall be
without prejudice.
(5) The department may engage with the applicant's identified
vendor to verify debts or estimates and effectuate payment
directly to the vendor.
SECTION 55. IC 10-17-12-12, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The director shall establish the capability to
receive donations to the fund from the public on the department's
Internet site. website.
SECTION 56. IC 10-17-12-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.132-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as provided in section 15 of this
chapter, the department shall approve or deny an application for a grant
filed with the department after June 30, 2019, within sixty (60) days.
(b) The department shall notify the applicant by mail or
electronic mail within seven (7) days after a determination is made
concerning the applicant's application.
SECTION 57. IC 10-17-12-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) An applicant whose
request for short term financial assistance from the fund is denied
may appeal the determination by submitting an appeal letter to the
department.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

52
(b) An applicant has thirty (30) days from the date of the
postmark of the determination letter to appeal the decision.
(c) The appeal shall be conducted in accordance with
IC 4-21.5-3.
SECTION 58. IC 10-17-13-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.7-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission shall manage and develop
the fund and the assets of the fund.
(b) The commission shall do the following:
(1) Carry out the duties of the commission set forth in IC 10-17-1.
(2) Establish written guidelines that specify the criteria for
determining priority of applications for the purpose of providing
financial assistance to qualified service members or dependents
of qualified service members applicants as described under
IC 10-17-12-8(c).
(3) Establish a policy to determine annually the maximum total
dollar amount that may be expended for each state fiscal year
from the military family relief fund established by IC 10-17-12-8.
(4) Establish a policy for the investment of the assets of the fund.
In establishing a policy under this subdivision, the commission
shall:
(A) establish adequate long term financial goals for the fund;
and
(B) provide adequate funding for the military family relief
fund established by IC 10-17-12-8.
(5) Acquire money for the fund through the solicitation of private
or public donations and other revenue producing activities.
(6) Perform other tasks consistent with prudent management and
development of the fund.
SECTION 59. IC 10-17-13.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "veteran" means an
individual residing in Indiana who:
(1) has served in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States or their reserves, in the national guard, or in the Indiana
National Guard; and
(2) received a discharge from military service under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
SECTION 60. IC 10-18-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.149-2016,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana war memorials commission is
HEA 1343 — CC 1

53
established.
(b) The commission consists of nine (9) members. Each Indiana
congressional district must be represented by at least one (1) member
who is:
(1) a resident of that congressional district;
(2) a veteran of service in the armed forces of the United States of
America in time of war;
(3) a citizen of Indiana at the time of the service; and
(4) appointed:
(A) in the manner;
(B) for the terms;
(C) to have the powers; and
(D) to perform the duties;
as provided in this chapter.
(c) The commission:
(1) as the commission and in the commission's name, may
prosecute and defend suits; and
(2) has all other duties, rights, and powers that are:
(A) necessary to implement this chapter; and
(B) not inconsistent with this chapter.
(d) The members of the commission are not liable in their individual
capacity, except to the state, for any act done or omitted in connection
with the performance of their duties under this chapter.
(e) A suit against the commission must be brought in a court with
jurisdiction in Marion County. Notice or summons of the suit shall be
served upon the president, vice president, or secretary of the
commission. In a suit against the commission, it is not necessary to
name the individual members of the commission as either plaintiff or
defendant. Commission members may sue and be sued in the name of
the Indiana war memorials commission.
(f) The commission shall
(1) report to the governor in a manner prescribed by the
governor. through the adjutant general; and
(2) be under the adjutant general for administrative supervision.
SECTION 61. IC 11-12-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does
not apply to a person confined to a county jail who:
(1) maintains a policy of insurance from a private company
covering:
(A) medical care;
(B) dental care;
(C) eye care; or
HEA 1343 — CC 1

54
(D) any other health care related service; or
(2) is willing to pay for the person's own medical care.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person confined to a
county jail may be required to make a copayment in an amount of not
more than fifteen dollars ($15) thirty dollars ($30) for each provision
of any of the following services:
(1) Medical care.
(2) Dental care.
(3) Eye care.
(4) Any other health care related service.
(c) A person confined to a county jail is not required to make the
copayment under subsection (b) if:
(1) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account at the time the service is provided;
(2) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account within sixty (60) days one hundred
eighty (180) days after the service is provided;
(3) the service is provided in an emergency;
(4) the service is provided as a result of an injury received in the
county jail; or
(5) the service is provided at the request of the sheriff or jail
administrator.
(d) Money collected must be deposited into the county medical care
for inmates fund.
(e) Rules for the implementation of this section must be approved
by the county legislative body.
SECTION 62. IC 14-15-2-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) This section does not apply to a motorboat competing
in and during a motorboat race for which a permit has been issued by
the department.
(b) A person may not operate a motorboat on Indiana water unless
the boat motor is equipped with:
(1) a muffler;
(2) an underwater exhaust; or
(3) other device;
that muffles or suppresses the sound of the exhaust.
SECTION 63. IC 14-15-2-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 5. (a) This section does not apply to a motorboat competing
in and during a motorboat race for which a permit has been issued by
the department.
(b) A person may not operate a motorboat on Indiana water if the
boat motor is equipped with any of the following:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

55
(1) A muffler cutout.
(2) A bypass.
(3) Any device similar to a muffler cutout or bypass.
SECTION 64. IC 14-15-2-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c), this section applies to sailing vessels at
least seven (7) meters in length. the following:
(1) Nonpowered boats including canoes and kayaks.
(2) Sailboats not more than twenty-two (22) feet in length under
sail alone.
(3) Boats powered only by electric motor on lakes restricted to
propulsion solely by oars, paddles, or electric motors.
(4) Any boat using an electric motor for positioning purposes
only.
(b) A boat sailing vessel described under subsection (a) must be
equipped with lights as required by 33 CFR 83.25. a hand portable
lantern or flashlight not affixed or attached to any part of the boat and
capable of throwing a white light visible for a distance of at least two
(2) miles. The operator of the boat shall display the same or the white
light aft, if available, in sufficient time to avoid a collision with any
other boat that is being operated in accordance with this article.
(c) A sailing vessel:
(1) less than seven (7) meters in length; or
(2) powered by oars;
may be equipped with lights as permitted under 33 CFR 83.25.
SECTION 65. IC 14-15-2-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. As required by the United
States Coast Guard under 46 U.S.C. 4312, a vessel must be
equipped with an engine cut-off switch.
SECTION 66. IC 14-15-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.69-2009,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. A person operating a boat shall observe the
following all traffic rules under 33 CFR 83, if applicable. when
applicable:
(1) When two (2) boats are approaching each other "head and
head", or nearly so, each boat shall bear to the right and pass the
other boat on the boat's left side.
(2) When two (2) boats are approaching each other obliquely or
at right angles, the boat on the right has the right-of-way.
However, when:
(A) one (1) boat is under sail or is nonmotorized, the sailboat
HEA 1343 — CC 1

56
or nonmotorized boat has the right-of-way; and
(B) two (2) boats are under sail or are nonmotorized, the boat
on the right has the right-of-way.
(3) A boat operated on a river or a channel shall bear to the right.
(4) A boat may overtake and pass another boat on either side if
the passing can be done with safety and within the assured clear
distance ahead, but the boat overtaken has the right-of-way.
(5) A boat leaving a dock, a pier, a wharf, or the shore has the
right-of-way over all boats approaching the dock, pier, wharf, or
shore.
SECTION 67. IC 14-15-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) A person who violates section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5,
6, 7(b), 9, 10, or 13 of this chapter commits a Class C infraction.
(b) A person who violates section 7(c) or 8 of this chapter commits
a Class A infraction. Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(a), a judgment of
at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be imposed for each Class
A infraction committed in violation of section 7(c) or 8 of this chapter.
SECTION 68. IC 16-33-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
superintendent of the home shall be appointed in the manner prescribed
by law and must meet all of the following conditions:
(1) Be a teacher licensed by the state or have at least a
baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university in
a field related to education or child growth and development.
(2) Have experience working with children.
(3) At the time of appointment, be a resident and citizen of
Indiana.
(4) Have other qualifications as required by the state health
commissioner.
(b) When at least two (2) candidates meet the conditions listed in
subsection (a), the state health commissioner shall give preference to
individuals who have been discharged from the armed forces of the
United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) IC 10-17-12-8.1(2) in appointing a candidate to the
position of superintendent of the home.
SECTION 69. IC 20-20-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible veteran" refers
to an individual who has the following qualifications:
(1) Served as a member of the armed forces of the United States
HEA 1343 — CC 1

57
at any time during at least one (1) of the following periods:
(A) Beginning April 6, 1917, and ending November 11, 1918
(World War I).
(B) Beginning December 7, 1941, and ending December 31,
1946 (World War II).
(C) Beginning June 27, 1950, and ending January 31, 1955
(Korean Conflict).
(D) Beginning August 5, 1964, and ending May 7, 1975
(Vietnam Conflict).
(2) Before the military service described in subdivision (1):
(A) attended a public or nonpublic high school in Indiana; and
(B) was a student in good standing at the high school
described in clause (A), to the satisfaction of the department
of veterans' affairs.
(3) Did not graduate or receive a diploma because of leaving the
high school described in subdivision (2) for the military service
described in subdivision (1).
(4) Was discharged from the armed forces of the United States
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
SECTION 70. IC 20-20-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The department and the department of
veterans' affairs shall jointly design a form for the application for
issuance of a diploma under the program.
(b) The application form must require at least the following
information about an eligible veteran:
(1) Personal identification information.
(2) Military service information, including a copy of the eligible
veteran's discharge from military service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(3) High school information, including the following:
(A) Name and address, including county, of the last high
school attended.
(B) Whether the high school was a public or nonpublic school.
(C) Years attended.
(D) Year of leaving high school to begin military service.
(E) Year in which the veteran would have graduated if the
veteran had not left high school to begin military service.
(4) If the high school attended was a public school, whether the
veteran prefers receiving a diploma issued by:
HEA 1343 — CC 1

58
(A) the state board; or
(B) the governing body of the school corporation governing
the high school.
SECTION 71. IC 21-12-13-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to the following
scholarship and fee remission statutes:
(1) IC 21-12-3.
(2) IC 21-12-4.
(3) IC 21-12-6.
(4) IC 21-13-2.
(5) IC 21-13-7.
(6) IC 21-13-8.
(7) IC 21-13-4.
(8) IC 21-14-5.
(9) IC 21-12-16.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a grant or reduction in fees
under IC 21-13-4. Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), and
except for a scholarship granted under IC 21-13-8 to an individual
described in IC 21-13-8-1(b)(2)(B), a grant or reduction in tuition or
fees, including all renewals and extensions, under any of the laws listed
in subsection (a) may not exceed the number of terms that constitutes
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2), four (4) undergraduate
academic years, as determined by the commission, or
(2) for purposes of IC 21-13-4, six (6) academic years as
determined by the commission;
and must be used within eight (8) years after the date the individual
first applies and becomes eligible for benefits under the applicable law.
(c) A grant or reduction in tuition or fees, including all renewals
and extensions, under IC 21-13-4 may not exceed the number of
terms that constitutes six (6) academic years as determined by the
commission.
(c) (d) The commission may, subject to the availability of funds,
extend eligibility under subsection (b) for a recipient who used a grant
or reduction in tuition or fees under any of the statutes listed in
subsection (a) at a postsecondary educational institution that closed.
The extension of eligibility may not exceed the number of terms used
by the recipient at the postsecondary educational institution that closed.
SECTION 72. IC 22-4.1-4-3.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 61, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.3. (a) As used in this section, "veteran" means:
(1) a Hoosier veteran (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(b)); or
HEA 1343 — CC 1

59
(2) an individual who satisfies the following:
(A) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(B) The individual has previously served on active duty in any
branch of the armed forces of the United States or their
reserves, in the National Guard, or in the Indiana National
Guard.
(C) The individual received a discharge from service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(b) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, the department shall
give a veteran or the spouse of a veteran priority for placement in any
federal or state employment or training program administered by the
department if the veteran or the veteran's spouse:
(1) submits documentation satisfactory to the department
establishing the veteran's honorable discharge from service; and
(2) meets the eligibility requirements for the program.
SECTION 73. IC 25-8-12.1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. A person who:
(1) enters active military service of the United States or of this
state:
(A) in time of war or an emergency;
(B) for or during a period of training; or
(C) in connection with or under the operation of a system of
selective service; and
(2) at the time of entry holds a valid license as a registered barber;
shall be granted a similar certificate of registration or license upon
presenting to the board a discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2),
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2), dated not more than six (6) months before the time
of the presentation. The similar certificate or license shall be granted
by the board upon payment of a fee established by the board.
SECTION 74. IC 25-10-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 76, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Any applicant for a license to practice
chiropractic who is a graduate of a legally incorporated chiropractic
school, institution or college, and who can produce satisfactory
evidence to the board that the:
(1) applicant's chiropractic education was interrupted by reason
of the applicant's induction or enlistment into the active armed
forces of the United States; and
(2) applicant received a discharge from the armed forces under
HEA 1343 — CC 1

60
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2);
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2);
is entitled to have the applicant's date of graduation determined as if
the applicant had completed the applicant's course of study in
chiropractic without the interruption.
SECTION 75. IC 25-25-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 77, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This section applies to:
(1) any veteran described in IC 10-17-5-2 or IC 10-17-5-1 (before
their repeal); or
(2) any other veteran to whom this chapter applies because of the
provisions of any other statute;
who received a discharge from military service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) IC 10-17-12-8.1(2)
from such service issued by the proper authorities. Such a person shall
be entitled to a license to vend, hawk, and peddle goods, wares, fruits,
and merchandise in any county, city, or town in Indiana without the
payment of any fee for the license. Upon the presentation of the
person's certificate and papers of discharge, properly executed, to the
auditor of any county and proving the person's identity as the person
named in the person's certificate of discharge, the auditor shall issue to
the former soldier or sailor a free license to vend, hawk, and peddle
goods, wares, fruits, and merchandise in the county and in all cities and
towns in the county. A fee may not be charged to the holder of the
license by the auditor, by the authorities of any city or town in the
county, or by any other officer. The license shall be full and complete
authority to vend, hawk, and peddle without the payment of any sum of
money.
(b) A person who acquires a license under this section is subject to
all county, city, or town regulations and ordinances concerning
vendors, hawkers, or peddlers, except for those provisions requiring
payment of money for obtaining a license.
SECTION 76. IC 25-37-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section applies to a county having a
consolidated city.
(b) A veteran who received a discharge from the armed forces of the
United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) IC 10-17-12-8.1(2) is exempt from the payment of
a fee for a transient merchant license issued under this chapter by a
municipality located wholly or partially within the county.
(c) Upon the presentation of the veteran's certificate and papers of
HEA 1343 — CC 1

61
discharge and proof of the veteran's identity, the official designated by
the municipality shall issue a transient merchant license to the veteran.
A person licensed under this section shall comply with all ordinances
of the county or municipality governing transient merchants.
SECTION 77. IC 34-13-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A governmental entity or an
employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment is not
liable if a loss results from the following:
(1) The natural condition of unimproved property.
(2) The condition of a reservoir, dam, canal, conduit, drain, or
similar structure when used by a person for a purpose that is not
foreseeable.
(3) The temporary condition of a public thoroughfare or extreme
sport area that results from weather.
(4) The condition of an unpaved road, trail, or footpath, the
purpose of which is to provide access to a recreation or scenic
area.
(5) The design, construction, control, operation, or normal
condition of an extreme sport area, if all entrances to the extreme
sport area are marked with:
(A) a set of rules governing the use of the extreme sport area;
(B) a warning concerning the hazards and dangers associated
with the use of the extreme sport area; and
(C) a statement that the extreme sport area may be used only
by persons operating extreme sport equipment.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain extreme
sports areas in a reasonably safe condition.
(6) The initiation of a judicial or an administrative proceeding.
(7) The performance of a discretionary function; however, the
provision of medical or optical care as provided in IC 34-6-2.1-54
shall be considered as a ministerial act.
(8) The adoption and enforcement of or failure to adopt or
enforce:
(A) a law (including rules and regulations); or
(B) in the case of a public school or charter school, a policy;
unless the act of enforcement constitutes false arrest or false
imprisonment.
(9) An act or omission performed in good faith and without
malice under the apparent authority of a statute which is invalid
if the employee would not have been liable had the statute been
HEA 1343 — CC 1

62
valid.
(10) The act or omission of anyone other than the governmental
entity or the governmental entity's employee.
(11) The issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of, or failure
or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any permit, license,
certificate, approval, order, or similar authorization, where the
authority is discretionary under the law.
(12) Failure to make an inspection, or making an inadequate or
negligent inspection, of any property, other than the property of
a governmental entity, to determine whether the property
complied with or violates any law or contains a hazard to health
or safety.
(13) Entry upon any property where the entry is expressly or
impliedly authorized by law.
(14) Misrepresentation if unintentional.
(15) Theft by another person of money in the employee's official
custody, unless the loss was sustained because of the employee's
own negligent or wrongful act or omission.
(16) Injury to the property of a person under the jurisdiction and
control of the department of correction if the person has not
exhausted the administrative remedies and procedures provided
by section 7 of this chapter.
(17) Injury to the person or property of a person under supervision
of a governmental entity and who is:
(A) on probation;
(B) assigned to an alcohol and drug services program under
IC 12-23, a minimum security release program under
IC 11-10-8, a pretrial conditional release program under
IC 35-33-8, or a community corrections program under
IC 11-12; or
(C) subject to a court order requiring the person to be escorted
by a county police officer while on or in a government
building (as defined in IC 36-9-13-3) owned by a county
building authority under IC 36-9-13, unless the injury is the
result of an act or omission amounting to:
(i) gross negligence;
(ii) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(iii) intentional misconduct.
(18) Design of a highway (as defined in IC 9-13-2-73), toll road
project (as defined in IC 8-15-2-4(4)), tollway (as defined in
IC 8-15-3-7), or project (as defined in IC 8-15.7-2-14) if the
claimed loss occurs at least twenty (20) years after the public
HEA 1343 — CC 1

63
highway, toll road project, tollway, or project was designed or
substantially redesigned; except that this subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve a responsible governmental entity from the
continuing duty to provide and maintain public highways in a
reasonably safe condition.
(19) Development, adoption, implementation, operation,
maintenance, or use of an enhanced emergency communication
system.
(20) Injury to a student or a student's property by an employee of
a school corporation if the employee is acting reasonably under a:
(A) discipline policy adopted under IC 20-33-8-12; or
(B) restraint and seclusion plan adopted under IC 20-20-40-14.
(21) An act or omission performed in good faith under the
apparent authority of a court order described in IC 35-46-1-15.1
or IC 35-46-1-15.3 that is invalid, including an arrest or
imprisonment related to the enforcement of the court order, if the
governmental entity or employee would not have been liable had
the court order been valid.
(22) An act taken to investigate or remediate hazardous
substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
brownfield (as defined in IC 13-11-2-19.3) unless:
(A) the loss is a result of reckless conduct; or
(B) the governmental entity was responsible for the initial
placement of the hazardous substances, petroleum, or other
pollutants on the brownfield.
(23) The operation of an off-road vehicle (as defined in
IC 14-8-2-185) by a nongovernmental employee, or by a
governmental employee not acting within the scope of the
employment of the employee, on a public highway in a county
road system outside the corporate limits of a city or town, unless
the loss is the result of an act or omission amounting to:
(A) gross negligence;
(B) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(C) intentional misconduct.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain highways
in a reasonably safe condition for the operation of motor vehicles
licensed by the bureau of motor vehicles for operation on public
highways.
(24) Any act or omission rendered in connection with a request,
investigation, assessment, or opinion provided under
IC 36-9-28.7.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

64
(25) Any act or omission rendered in connection with an
Indiana civilian cyber corps program deployment as provided
under IC 10-16-22.
(b) This subsection applies to a cause of action that accrues during
a period of a state disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19, if the state of disaster emergency was declared
after February 29, 2020, and before April 1, 2022. A governmental
entity or an employee acting within the scope of the employee's
employment is not liable for an act or omission arising from COVID-19
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentional misrepresentation. If a claim
described in this subsection is:
(1) a claim for injury or death resulting from medical malpractice;
and
(2) not barred by the immunity provided under this subsection;
the claimant is required to comply with all of the provisions of
IC 34-18 (medical malpractice act).
SECTION 78. IC 34-30-2.1-125.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 125.2. IC 10-16-22-3 (Concerning
Indiana civilian cyber corps volunteers or civilian cyber corps
advisers).
SECTION 79. IC 34-30-2.1-125.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 125.3. IC 10-16-22-4 (Concerning
Indiana civilian cyber corps volunteers or civilian cyber corps
advisers).
SECTION 80. IC 34-30-8-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. If a person or entity,
other than a person or entity listed in subdivisions (1) through (10),
enters into a written agreement to use space in an armory for a function,
the following persons and entities are not liable for civil damages for
any property damage or bodily injury resulting from the serving of food
or beverages at the function held at the armory:
(1) The state.
(2) The Indiana army national guard.
(3) The Indiana air national guard.
(4) The army national guard of the United States.
(5) The air national guard of the United States.
(6) The adjutant general appointed under IC 10-16-2-6.
(7) The assistant adjutants general additional general officers
appointed under IC 10-16-2-7.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

65
(8) The officers and enlisted members of the Indiana army
national guard and the Indiana air national guard.
(9) The state armory board appointed under IC 10-16-3-1 and the
members of that board.
(10) The local armory board appointed under IC 10-16-4-1 for the
armory and the members of that board.
SECTION 81. IC 35-31.5-2-164.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 164.4. "Imitation firearm", for
purposes of IC 35-47-9-2, means an object or device that is
substantially similar in coloration and overall appearance to a
firearm that a reasonable person would believe the object or device
is a firearm.
SECTION 82. IC 35-31.5-2-185, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 85, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 185. (a) "Law enforcement officer" means:
(1) a police officer (including a tribal police officer, a correctional
police officer, and a hospital police officer employed by a hospital
police department established under IC 16-18-4), sheriff,
constable, marshal, prosecuting attorney, special prosecuting
attorney, special deputy prosecuting attorney, the securities
commissioner, the state fire marshal, the executive director of the
department of homeland security, or the inspector general;
(2) a deputy of any of those persons;
(3) an investigator for a prosecuting attorney or for the inspector
general;
(4) a conservation officer;
(5) an enforcement officer of the alcohol and tobacco
commission;
(6) an enforcement officer of the securities division of the office
of the secretary of state;
(7) a gaming agent employed under IC 4-33-4.5 or a gaming
control officer employed by the gaming control division under
IC 4-33-20; or
(8) a fire investigator of the department of homeland security; or
(9) a member in the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard while exercising police powers in accordance
with IC 10-16-23-3.
(b) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-42-2-1,
includes an alcoholic beverage enforcement officer, as set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(c) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-45-15,
HEA 1343 — CC 1

66
includes a federal enforcement officer, as set forth in IC 35-45-15-3.
(d) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-44.1-3-1 and
IC 35-44.1-3-2, includes a school resource officer (as defined in
IC 20-26-18.2-1) and a school corporation police officer appointed
under IC 20-26-16.
(e) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-40.5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-40.5-1-1.
SECTION 83. IC 35-47-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A:
(A) federal;
(B) state; or
(C) local;
law enforcement officer.
(2) A:
(A) qualified law enforcement officer (as defined in 18 U.S.C.
926B); or
(B) qualified retired law enforcement officer (as defined in 18
U.S.C. 926C);
if the qualified law enforcement officer or qualified retired law
enforcement officer, as applicable, carries the photographic
identification required by 18 U.S.C. 926B or 18 U.S.C. 926C.
(3) A person who may legally possess a firearm and who has been
authorized by:
(A) a school board (as defined by IC 20-26-9-4); or
(B) the body that administers a charter school established
under IC 20-24;
to carry a firearm in or on school property.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c), a person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses the firearm in a motor vehicle.
(5) A person who is a school resource officer, as defined in
IC 20-26-18.2-1.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c), a person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses only a firearm that is:
(i) locked in the trunk of the person's motor vehicle;
(ii) kept in the glove compartment of the person's locked
motor vehicle; or
(iii) stored out of plain sight in the person's locked motor
vehicle.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

67
(7) A person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses a firearm on school property in connection with
or while:
(i) attending a worship service or religious ceremony
conducted at a house of worship located on the school
property; or
(ii) carrying out the person's official duties at a house of
worship located on the school property, if the person is
employed by or a volunteer at the house of worship.
This subdivision does not affect the right of a property owner to
prohibit, in whole or in part, the possession of a firearm on a
property where a school or house of worship is located.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(6), a person does not
include a person who is:
(1) enrolled as a student in any high school except if the person is
a high school student and is a member of a shooting sports team
and the school's principal has approved the person keeping a
firearm concealed in the person's motor vehicle on the days the
person is competing or practicing as a member of a shooting
sports team; or
(2) a former student of the school if the person is no longer
enrolled in the school due to a disciplinary action within the
previous twenty-four (24) months.
(c) For purposes of:
(1) subsection (a)(4); and
(2) subsection (a)(6); and
(3) section 2(b) of this chapter;
a motor vehicle does not include a motor vehicle owned, leased, or
controlled by a school or school district unless the person who
possesses the firearm is authorized by the school or school district to
possess a firearm.
SECTION 84. IC 35-47-9-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person may not be charged with an
offense under this subsection if the person may be charged with an
offense described in subsection (c). (d). A person who knowingly or
intentionally possesses a firearm:
(1) in or on school property; or
(2) on a school bus;
commits a Level 6 felony.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally possesses an
HEA 1343 — CC 1

68
imitation firearm:
(1) in or on school property; or
(2) on a school bus;
commits possession of an imitation firearm on a school property,
a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) (c) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection subsections
(a) and (b) that:
(1) the person is permitted to legally possess the firearm or
imitation firearm; and
(2) the firearm or imitation firearm is:
(A) locked in the trunk of the person's motor vehicle;
(B) kept in the glove compartment of the person's locked
motor vehicle; or
(C) stored out of plain sight in the person's locked motor
vehicle.
(c) (d) A person who is permitted to legally possess a firearm and
who knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly leaves the firearm in plain
view in a motor vehicle that is parked in a school parking lot commits
a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 85. IC 36-1-8.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement
officer" means an individual who is employed or was formerly
employed as:
(1) a police officer (including a tribal police officer, a correctional
police officer, and a hospital police officer employed by a hospital
police department established under IC 16-18-4), sheriff,
constable, marshal, prosecuting attorney, special prosecuting
attorney, special deputy prosecuting attorney, the securities
commissioner, or the inspector general;
(2) a deputy of any of the persons specified in subdivision (1);
(3) an investigator for a prosecuting attorney or for the inspector
general;
(4) a conservation officer;
(5) an enforcement officer of the alcohol and tobacco
commission; or
(6) an enforcement officer of the securities division of the office
of the secretary of state; or
(7) a member in the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard while exercising police powers in accordance
with IC 10-16-23-3.
SECTION 86. IC 36-8-2.1-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.64-2022,
HEA 1343 — CC 1

69
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. As used in this chapter, "public safety officer"
means the following:
(1) A police officer who is a full-time, paid, nonprobationary
member of a police department. The term does not include a:
(A) member in the military police force of the Indiana
National Guard under IC 10-16-23;
(B) tribal police officer; or
(C) a member of the state police department.
(2) A firefighter who is a full-time, paid, nonprobationary member
of a fire department. The term does not include a volunteer
firefighter.
SECTION 87. IC 36-8-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 92, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the board or
persons having the authority to employ members of the fire or police
department shall give a preference for employment according to the
following priority:
(1) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed forces
of the United States under conditions other than conditions set
forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) A person whose mother or father was a:
(A) firefighter of a unit;
(B) municipal police officer; or
(C) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the board or person having the
authority to employ members of a fire or police department may give
a preference for employment to any of the following:
(1) A police officer or firefighter laid off by another city under
section 11 of this chapter.
(2) A county police officer laid off by a sheriff's department under
IC 36-8-10-11.1.
(3) A person who:
(A) was employed full-time or part-time by a township to
provide fire protection and emergency services; and
(B) has been laid off by the township.
(c) A person described in subsection (a) or (b) may not receive a
preference for employment unless the person:
(1) applies; and
(2) meets all employment requirements prescribed:
(A) by law, including physical and age requirements; and
HEA 1343 — CC 1

70
(B) by the fire or police department.
SECTION 88. IC 36-8-4.7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any contrary law, an
appointing authority shall waive any age restriction for a person not
more than forty (40) years and six (6) months of age that applies to the
appointment and hiring of an individual as:
(1) a member of the police department; or
(2) a member of the fire department;
if the individual meets the requirements of subsection (b).
(b) An individual who meets all the following requirements is
entitled to the waiver described in subsection (a):
(1) On the date the individual applies to be appointed and hired
as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department;
the individual is a veteran who has completed at least twenty (20)
years of military service.
(2) The individual received or is eligible to receive a discharge
from the armed forces of the United States under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(3) The individual meets all other requirements for appointment
and hiring as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department;
including all physical requirements.
(c) An individual who is entitled to the waiver described in
subsection (a) is eligible to become a member of the 1977 fund.
SECTION 89. IC 36-8-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 95, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A police officer or firefighter desiring to
return to service in the police or fire department shall report to the
person responsible for regulating and employing members of the
department. This action must be taken within sixty (60) days after a
discharge under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) IC 10-17-12-8.1(2) from military service or
government war work.
(b) Within fifteen (15) days after the police officer or firefighter
reports to the department, the police officer or firefighter shall be
placed on duty at the rank held at the time of entering military service
or government war work.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

71
(c) If a member of the police or fire department is refused a proper
assignment under subsection (b), the member of the police or fire
department may file an action in the circuit court, superior court, or
probate court of the county in the manner prescribed by IC 36-8-3-4.
SECTION 90. IC 36-8-10-10.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 96, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.4. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the board shall
give a preference for employment according to the following priority:
(1) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed forces
of the United States under conditions other than conditions set
forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
(2) A person whose mother or father was a:
(A) firefighter of a unit;
(B) municipal police officer; or
(C) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the board may give a preference for
employment to any of the following:
(1) A member of another department laid off under section 11.1
of this chapter.
(2) A police officer laid off by a city under IC 36-8-4-11.
(c) A person described in subsection (a) or (b) may not receive a
preference for employment unless the person:
(1) applies; and
(2) meets all employment requirements prescribed:
(A) by law, including physical and age requirements; and
(B) by the department.
SECTION 91. IC 36-8-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The executive of a township,
with the approval of the legislative body, may do the following:
(1) Purchase firefighting and emergency services apparatus and
equipment for the township, provide for the housing, care,
maintenance, operation, and use of the apparatus and equipment
to provide services within the township but outside the corporate
boundaries of municipalities, and employ full-time or part-time
personnel to operate the apparatus and equipment and to provide
services in that area. Preference in employment under this section
shall be given according to the following priority:
(A) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed
forces of the United States under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). IC 10-17-12-8.1(2).
HEA 1343 — CC 1

72
(B) A person whose mother or father was a:
(i) firefighter of a unit;
(ii) municipal police officer; or
(iii) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
The executive of a township may give a preference for
employment under this section to a person who was employed
full-time or part-time by another township to provide fire
protection and emergency services and has been laid off by the
township. The executive of a township may also give a preference
for employment to a firefighter laid off by a city under
IC 36-8-4-11. A person described in this subdivision may not
receive a preference for employment unless the person applies for
employment and meets all employment requirements prescribed
by law, including physical and age requirements, and all
employment requirements prescribed by the fire department.
(2) Contract with a municipality in the township or in a
contiguous township that maintains adequate firefighting or
emergency services apparatus and equipment to provide fire
protection or emergency services for the township in accordance
with IC 36-1-7.
(3) Cooperate with a municipality in the township or in a
contiguous township in the purchase, maintenance, and upkeep of
firefighting or emergency services apparatus and equipment for
use in the municipality and township in accordance with
IC 36-1-7.
(4) Contract with a volunteer fire department that has been
organized to fight fires in the township for the use and operation
of firefighting apparatus and equipment that has been purchased
by the township in order to save the private and public property
of the township from destruction by fire, including use of the
apparatus and equipment in an adjoining township by the
department if the department has made a contract with the
executive of the adjoining township for the furnishing of
firefighting service within the township.
(5) Contract with a volunteer fire department that maintains
adequate firefighting service in accordance with IC 36-8-12.
(6) Use money in the township's rainy day fund to pay costs
attributable to providing fire protection or emergency services
under this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies only to townships that provide fire
protection or emergency services or both under subsection (a)(1) and
HEA 1343 — CC 1

73
to municipalities that have some part of the municipal territory within
a township and do not have a full-time paid fire department. A
township may provide fire protection or emergency services or both
without contracts inside the corporate boundaries of the municipalities
if before July 1 of a year the following occur:
(1) The legislative body of the municipality adopts an ordinance
to have the township provide the services without a contract.
(2) The township legislative body passes a resolution approving
the township's provision of the services without contracts to the
municipality.
In a township providing services to a municipality under this section,
the legislative body of either the township or a municipality in the
township may opt out of participation under this subsection by adopting
an ordinance or a resolution, respectively, before July 1 of a year.
(c) This subsection applies only to a township that:
(1) is located in a county containing a consolidated city;
(2) has at least three (3) included towns (as defined in
IC 36-3-1-7) that have all municipal territory completely within
the township on January 1, 1996; and
(3) provides fire protection or emergency services, or both, under
subsection (a)(1);
and to included towns (as defined in IC 36-3-1-7) that have all the
included town's municipal territory completely within the township. A
township may provide fire protection or emergency services, or both,
without contracts inside the corporate boundaries of the municipalities
if before August 1 of the year preceding the first calendar year to which
this subsection applies the township legislative body passes a
resolution approving the township's provision of the services without
contracts to the municipality. The resolution must identify the included
towns to which the resolution applies. In a township providing services
to a municipality under this section, the legislative body of the
township may opt out of participation under this subsection by adopting
a resolution before July 1 of a year. A copy of a resolution adopted
under this subsection shall be submitted to the executive of each
included town covered by the resolution, the county auditor, and the
department of local government finance.
HEA 1343 — CC 1

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1343 — CC 1